Nevada, session 83, AB424.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 125C.003 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
125C.003 [1.] A court may award primary physical custody
to a parent if the court determines that joint physical custody is not
in the best interest of a child. An award of joint physical custody is
presumed not to be in the best interest of the child if:
[(a)] 1. The court determines by substantial evidence that a
parent is unable to adequately care for a minor child for at least 146
days of the year;
[(b) A child is born out of wedlock and the provisions of
subsection 2 are applicable;] or
[(c)] 2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6 of NRS
125C.0035 or NRS 125C.210, there has been a determination by the
court after an evidentiary hearing and finding by clear and
convincing evidence that a parent has engaged in one or more acts
of domestic violence against the child, a parent of the child or any
other person residing with the child. The presumption created by
this [paragraph] subsection is a rebuttable presumption.
[2. A court may award primary physical custody of a child
born out of wedlock to:
(a) The mother of the child if:
(1) The mother has not married the father of the child;
-
*AB424*

– 5 –
(2) A judgment or order of a court, or a judgment or order
entered pursuant to an expedited process, determining the paternity
of the child has not been entered; and
(3) The father of the child:
(I) Is not subject to any presumption of paternity under
NRS 126.051;
(II) Has never acknowledged paternity pursuant to NRS
126.053; or
(III) Has had actual knowledge of his paternity but has
abandoned the child.
(b) The father of the child if:
(1) The mother has abandoned the child; and
(2) The father has provided sole care and custody of the child
in her absence.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Abandoned” means that a mother or father has:
(1) Failed, for a continuous period of not less than 6 months,
to provide substantial personal and economic support to the child; or
(2) Knowingly declined, for a continuous period of not less
than 6 months, to have any meaningful relationship with the child.
(b) “Expedited process” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 126.161.]
Sec. 2. Chapter 126 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 3 to 92, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in sections 4 to 27,
inclusive, of this act have the meanings ascribed to them in those
sections.
Sec. 4. “Acknowledged parent” means a person who has
established a parent and child relationship under sections 39 to
52, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 5. “Adjudicated parent” means a person who has been
adjudicated to be a parent of a child by a court with jurisdiction.
Sec. 6. “Agency which provides child welfare services” has
the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 432B.030.
Sec. 7. “Alleged genetic parent” means a person who is
alleged to be, or alleges that the person is, a genetic parent or
possible genetic parent of a child whose parentage has not been
adjudicated. The term includes an alleged genetic father and
alleged genetic mother. The term does not include:
1. A presumed parent;
2. A person whose parental rights have been terminated or
declared not to exist; or
3. A donor.
-
*AB424*

– 6 –
Sec. 8. “Assisted reproduction” means a method of causing
pregnancy other than sexual intercourse. The term includes,
without limitation:
1. Intrauterine or intracervical insemination;
2. Donation of gametes;
3. Donation of embryos;
4. In vitro fertilization and transfer of embryos; and
5. Intracytoplasmic sperm injection.
Sec. 9. “Birth” includes stillbirth.
Sec. 10. “Child” means a person of any age whose parentage
may be determined under sections 29 to 90, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 11. “Child support agency” means a governmental
entity, public official or private agency authorized to provide
parentage-establishment services under Title IV-D of the Social
Security Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 651 to 669b, inclusive.
Sec. 12. “Custodial parent” means a parent who has been
awarded physical custody of a child or, if no award of physical
custody has been made by a court, the parent with whom the child
resides.
Sec. 13. “Determination of parentage” means establishment
of a parent and child relationship by a judicial or administrative
proceeding or signing of a valid acknowledgment of parentage
under sections 39 to 52, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 14. “Donor” means a person who provides gametes
intended for use in assisted reproduction, whether or not for
consideration. The term does not include:
1. A person who gives birth to a child conceived by assisted
reproduction, except as otherwise provided in NRS 126.500 to
126.810, inclusive, and sections 91 and 92 of this act; or
2. A parent or an intended parent under NRS 126.500 to
126.810, inclusive, and sections 91 and 92 of this act.
Sec. 15. “Gamete” means a sperm or egg.
Sec. 16. “Genetic testing” means an analysis of genetic
markers to identify or exclude a genetic relationship.
Sec. 17. “Intended parent” means a person, married or
unmarried, or in or not in a domestic partnership, who manifests
an intent to be legally bound as a parent of a child conceived by
assisted reproduction.
Sec. 18. “Parent” means a person who has established a
parent and child relationship under section 35 of this act.
Sec. 19. “Parentage” or “parent and child relationship”
means the legal relationship between a child and a parent of the
child.
Sec. 20. “Person” means a natural person of any age.
-
*AB424*

– 7 –
Sec. 21. “Presumed parent” means a person who under
section 38 of this act is presumed to be a parent of a child, unless
the presumption is overcome in a judicial proceeding, a valid
denial of parentage is made under sections 39 to 52, inclusive, of
this act or a court adjudicates the person to be a parent.
Sec. 22. “Record” means information that is inscribed on a
tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium
and is retrievable in perceivable form.
Sec. 23. “Sign” means, with present intent to authenticate or
adopt a record:
1. To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or
2. To attach to or logically associate with the record an
electronic symbol, sound or process.
Sec. 24. “Signatory” means a person who signs a record.
Sec. 25. “State” means a state of the United States, the
District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin
Islands or any territory or insular possession under the
jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes a federally
recognized Indian tribe.
Sec. 26. “Transfer” means a procedure for assisted
reproduction by which an embryo is placed in the body of the
person who will give birth to the child.
Sec. 27. “Witnessed” means that at least one person who is
authorized to sign has signed a record to verify that the person
personally observed a signatory sign the record.
Sec. 28. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, any reference to the father of a child or the mother of a
child includes a parent of any gender, and any reference to
paternity is equally applicable to parentage.
Sec. 29. Sections 29 to 90, inclusive, of this act may be cited
as the Uniform Parentage Act (2017).
Sec. 30. 1. Sections 29 to 90, inclusive, of this act apply to
an adjudication or determination of parentage.
2. Sections 29 to 90, inclusive, of this act do not create, affect,
enlarge or diminish parental rights or duties under law of this
State other than sections 29 to 90, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 31. Each district court may adjudicate parentage under
sections 29 to 90, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 32. In any proceeding in which a court of this State has
jurisdiction to determine the parentage of a child, the court shall
apply the law of this State to adjudicate parentage. The applicable
law does not depend on:
1. The place of birth of the child; or
2. The past or present residence of the child.
-
*AB424*

– 8 –
Sec. 33. A proceeding under sections 29 to 90, inclusive, of
this act is subject to the laws of this State other than sections 29 to
90, inclusive, of this act which govern the health, safety, privacy
and liberty of a child or other person who could be affected by
disclosure of information that could identify the child or other
person, including, without limitation, the address, telephone
number, digital contact information, place of employment, social
security number and child’s day care facility or school.
Sec. 34. To the extent practicable, a provision of sections 29
to 90, inclusive, of this act applicable to a father and child
relationship applies to a mother and child relationship and a
provision of sections 29 to 90, inclusive, of this act applicable to a
mother and child relationship applies to a father and child
relationship.
Sec. 35. A parent and child relationship is established
between a person and a child if:
1. The person gives birth to the child, except as otherwise
provided in NRS 126.500 to 126.810, inclusive, and sections 91
and 92 of this act;
2. There is a presumption under section 38 of this act of the
person’s parentage of the child, unless the presumption is
overcome in a judicial proceeding or a valid denial of parentage is
made under sections 39 to 52, inclusive, of this act;
3. The person is adjudicated a parent of the child by a court
of this State or any other state;
4. The person adopts the child;
5. The person acknowledges parentage of the child under
sections 39 to 52, inclusive, of this act, unless the acknowledgment
is rescinded under section 46 of this act or successfully challenged
under sections 39 to 52, inclusive, or 68 to 88, inclusive, of this
act; or
6. The person’s parentage of the child is established under
NRS 126.500 to 126.810, inclusive, and sections 91 and 92 of this
act.
Sec. 36. A parent and child relationship extends equally to
every child and parent, regardless of the marital status of the
parent.
Sec. 37. Unless parental rights are terminated, a parent and
child relationship established under sections 29 to 90, inclusive, of
this act applies for all purposes.
Sec. 38. 1. A person is presumed to be a parent of a child
if:
(a) Except as otherwise provided under NRS 126.500 to
126.810, inclusive, and sections 91 and 92 of this act or law of this
State other than sections 29 to 90, inclusive, of this act:
-
*AB424*

– 9 –
(1) The person and the person who gave birth to the child
are married to or in a domestic partnership with each other and
the child is born during the marriage or domestic partnership,
whether the marriage or domestic partnership is or could be
declared invalid;
(2) The person and the person who gave birth to the child
were married to or in a domestic partnership with each other and
the child is born not later than 300 days after the marriage or
domestic partnership is terminated by death, divorce, dissolution,
annulment or declaration of invalidity, or after a decree of
separation or separate maintenance, whether the marriage or
domestic partnership is or could be declared invalid; or
(3) The person and the person who gave birth to the child
married or entered into a domestic partnership with each other
after the birth of the child, whether the marriage or domestic
partnership is or could be declared invalid, the person at any time
asserted parentage of the child, and:
(I) The assertion is in a record filed with the State
Registrar of Vital Statistics; or
(II) The person agreed to be and is named as a parent of
the child on the birth certificate of the child; or
(b) The person resided in the same household with the child
for the first 2 years of the life of the child, including any period of
temporary absence, and openly held out the child as the person’s
child.
2. A presumption of parentage under this section may be
overcome, and competing claims to parentage may be resolved,
only by an adjudication under sections 68 to 88, inclusive, of this
act or a valid denial of parentage under sections 39 to 52,
inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 39. A person who gave birth to a child and an alleged
genetic parent of the child, intended parent under NRS 126.500 to
126.810, inclusive, and sections 91 and 92 of this act, or presumed
parent may sign an acknowledgment of parentage to establish the
parentage of the child.
Sec. 40. 1. An acknowledgment of parentage under section
39 of this act must:
(a) Be in a record signed by the person who gave birth to the
child and by the person seeking to establish a parent and child
relationship, and the signatures must be attested by an electronic
notary public or other notarial officer or witnessed;
(b) State that the child whose parentage is being
acknowledged:
-
*AB424*

– 10 –
(1) Does not have a presumed parent other than the person
seeking to establish the parent and child relationship or has a
presumed parent whose full name is stated; and
(2) Does not have another acknowledged parent,
adjudicated parent or person who is a parent of the child under
NRS 126.500 to 126.810, inclusive, and sections 91 and 92 of this
act other than the person who gave birth to the child; and
(c) State that the signatories understand that the
acknowledgment is the equivalent of an adjudication of parentage
of the child and that a challenge to the acknowledgment is
permitted only under limited circumstances and is barred 2 years
after the effective date of the acknowledgment.
2. An acknowledgment of parentage is void if, at the time of
signing:
(a) A person other than the person seeking to establish
parentage is a presumed parent, unless a denial of parentage by
the presumed parent in a signed record is filed with the State
Registrar of Vital Statistics; or
(b) A person, other than the person who gave birth to the child
or the person seeking to establish parentage, is an acknowledged
or adjudicated parent or a parent under NRS 126.500 to 126.810,
inclusive, and sections 91 and 92 of this act.
Sec. 41. A presumed parent or alleged genetic parent may
sign a denial of parentage in a record. The denial of parentage is
valid only if:
1. An acknowledgment of parentage by another person is
filed under section 43 of this act;
2. The signature of the presumed parent or alleged genetic
parent is attested by an electronic notary public or other notarial
officer or witnessed; and
3. The presumed parent or alleged genetic parent has not
previously:
(a) Completed a valid acknowledgment of parentage for the
same child, unless the previous acknowledgment was rescinded
under section 46 of this act or challenged successfully under
section 47 of this act; or
(b) Been adjudicated to be a parent of the child.
Sec. 42. 1. An acknowledgment of parentage and a denial
of parentage may be contained in a single document or may be in
counterparts and may be filed with the State Registrar of Vital
Statistics separately or simultaneously. If filing of the
acknowledgment and denial both are required under sections 29 to
90, inclusive, of this act, neither is effective until both are filed.
2. An acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage
may only be signed after the birth of the child.
-
*AB424*

– 11 –
3. Subject to subsection 1, an acknowledgment of parentage
or denial of parentage takes effect on the filing of the document
with the State Registrar of Vital Statistics.
4. An acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage
signed by a person who is a minor is valid if the acknowledgment
complies with sections 29 to 90, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 43. 1. Except as otherwise provided in sections 46 and
47 of this act, an acknowledgment of parentage that complies with
sections 39 to 52, inclusive, of this act and is filed with the State
Registrar of Vital Statistics is equivalent to an adjudication of
parentage of the child and confers on the acknowledged parent all
rights and duties of a parent.
2. Except as otherwise provided in sections 46 and 47 of this
act, a denial of parentage by a presumed parent or alleged genetic
parent which complies with sections 39 to 52, inclusive, of this act
and is filed with the State Registrar of Vital Statistics with an
acknowledgment of parentage that complies with sections 39 to 52,
inclusive, of this act is equivalent to an adjudication of the
nonparentage of the presumed parent or alleged genetic parent
who signed the denial and discharges the presumed parent or
alleged genetic parent who signed the denial from all rights and
duties of a parent.
Sec. 44. The State Registrar of Vital Statistics may not
charge a fee for filing an acknowledgment of parentage or denial
of parentage.
Sec. 45. A court conducting a judicial proceeding or an
administrative agency conducting an administrative proceeding is
not required or permitted to ratify an unchallenged
acknowledgment of parentage. A court may determine that a
person who signed an acknowledgment of parentage is a parent in
a later proceeding based on other grounds.
Sec. 46. 1. A signatory may rescind an acknowledgment of
parentage or denial of parentage by filing with the State Registrar
of Vital Statistics a rescission in a signed record which is attested
by an electronic notary public or notarial officer or witnessed,
before the earlier of:
(a) Sixty days after the effective date under section 42 of this
act of the acknowledgment or denial; or
(b) The date of the first hearing before a court in a proceeding,
to which the signatory is a party, to adjudicate an issue relating to
the child, including a proceeding that establishes support.
2. If an acknowledgment of parentage is rescinded under
subsection 1, an associated denial of parentage is invalid, and the
State Registrar of Vital Statistics shall notify the person who gave
birth to the child and the person who signed a denial of parentage
-
*AB424*

– 12 –
of the child that the acknowledgment has been rescinded. Failure
to give the notice required by this subsection does not affect the
validity of the rescission.
Sec. 47. 1. After the period for rescission under section 46
of this act expires, but not later than 2 years after the effective date
under section 42 of this act of an acknowledgment of parentage or
denial of parentage, a signatory of the acknowledgment or denial
may commence a proceeding to challenge the acknowledgment or
denial only on the basis of fraud, duress or material mistake of
fact.
2. A challenge to an acknowledgment of parentage or denial
of parentage by a person who was not a signatory to the
acknowledgment or denial is governed by section 77 of this act.
Sec. 48. 1. Every signatory to an acknowledgment of
parentage and any related denial of parentage must be made a
party to a proceeding to challenge the acknowledgment or denial.
2. By signing an acknowledgment of parentage or denial of
parentage, a signatory submits to personal jurisdiction in this
State in a proceeding to challenge the acknowledgment or denial,
effective on the filing of the acknowledgment or denial with the
State Registrar of Vital Statistics.
3. The court may not suspend the legal responsibilities
arising from an acknowledgment of parentage, including the duty
to pay child support, during the pendency of a proceeding to
challenge the acknowledgment or a related denial of parentage,
unless the party challenging the acknowledgment or denial shows
good cause.
4. A party challenging an acknowledgment of parentage or
denial of parentage has the burden of proof.
5. If the court determines that a party has satisfied the burden
of proof under subsection 4, the court shall order the State
Registrar of Vital Statistics to amend the birth record of the child
to reflect the legal parentage of the child.
6. A proceeding to challenge an acknowledgment of
parentage or denial of parentage must be conducted under
sections 68 to 88, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 49. The court shall give full faith and credit to an
acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage effective in
another state if the acknowledgment or denial was in a signed
record and otherwise complies with the law of the other state.
Sec. 50. A valid acknowledgment of parentage or denial of
parentage is not affected by a later modification of the declaration
developed by the State Board of Health pursuant to NRS 440.285.
Sec. 51. The State Registrar of Vital Statistics may release
information relating to an acknowledgment of parentage or denial
-
*AB424*

– 13 –
of parentage to a signatory of the acknowledgment or denial, a
court, federal agency, agency which provides child welfare
services and child support agency of this or another state.
Sec. 52. The State Board of Health may adopt any
regulations that are necessary to implement sections 39 to 52,
inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 53. As used in sections 53 to 67, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 54, 55 and 56 of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 54. “Ethnic or racial group” means, for the purpose of
genetic testing, a recognized group that a person identifies as the
person’s ancestry or part of the ancestry or that is identified by
other information.
Sec. 55. “Hypothesized genetic relationship” means an
asserted genetic relationship between a person and a child.
Sec. 56. “Relationship index” means a likelihood ratio that
compares the probability of a genetic marker given a hypothesized
genetic relationship and the probability of the genetic marker
given a genetic relationship between the child and a random
person of the ethnic or racial group used in the hypothesized
genetic relationship.
Sec. 57. 1. Sections 53 to 67, inclusive, of this act govern
genetic testing of a person in a proceeding to adjudicate
parentage, whether the person:
(a) Voluntarily submits to testing; or
(b) Is tested under an order of the court or as a result of the
facilitation of a child support agency.
2. Genetic testing may not be used:
(a) To challenge the parentage of a person who is a parent
under NRS 126.500 to 126.810, inclusive, and sections 91 and 92
of this act; or
(b) To establish the parentage of a person who is a donor.
Sec. 58. 1. Except as otherwise provided in sections 53 to
67, inclusive, or 68 to 88, inclusive, of this act, in a proceeding
under sections 29 to 90, inclusive, of this act to determine
parentage, the court shall order the child and any other person to
submit to genetic testing if a request for testing is supported by the
sworn statement of a party:
(a) Alleging a reasonable possibility that the person is the
child’s genetic parent; or
(b) Denying genetic parentage of the child and stating facts
establishing a reasonable possibility that the person is not a
genetic parent.
-
*AB424*

– 14 –
2. A child support agency may facilitate genetic testing only if
there is no acknowledged or adjudicated parent of a child other
than the person who gave birth to the child.
3. The court may not order, and a child support agency may
not facilitate, in utero genetic testing.
4. If two or more persons are subject to court-ordered genetic
testing, the court may order that testing be completed concurrently
or sequentially.
5. Genetic testing of a person who gave birth to a child is not
a condition precedent to testing of the child and a person whose
genetic parentage of the child is being determined. If the person
who gave birth to the child is unavailable or declines to submit to
genetic testing, the court may order genetic testing of the child and
each person whose genetic parentage of the child is being
adjudicated.
6. In a proceeding to adjudicate the parentage of a child
having a presumed parent or a person who claims to be a parent
under section 76 of this act, or to challenge an acknowledgment of
parentage, the court may deny a motion for genetic testing of the
child and any other person after considering the factors in
subsections 1 and 2 of section 80 of this act.
7. If a person requesting genetic testing is barred under
sections 68 to 88, inclusive, of this act from establishing the
person’s parentage, the court shall deny the request for genetic
testing.
8. An order under this section for genetic testing is
enforceable by contempt.
Sec. 59. 1. Genetic testing must be of a type reasonably
relied on by experts in the field of genetic testing and performed in
a testing laboratory accredited by:
(a) The AABB, formerly known as the American Association
of Blood Banks, or a successor to its functions; or
(b) An accrediting body designated by the Secretary of the
United States Department of Health and Human Services.
2. A specimen used in genetic testing may consist of a sample
or a combination of samples of blood, buccal cells, bone, hair or
other body tissue or fluid. The specimen used in the testing need
not be of the same kind for each person undergoing genetic
testing.
3. Based on the ethnic or racial group of a person
undergoing genetic testing, a testing laboratory shall determine
the databases from which to select frequencies for use in
calculating a relationship index. If a person or a child support
agency objects to the laboratory’s choice, the following rules
apply:
-
*AB424*

– 15 –
(a) Not later than 30 days after receipt of the report of the test,
the objecting person or child support agency may request the court
to require the laboratory to recalculate the relationship index
using an ethnic or racial group different from that used by the
laboratory.
(b) The person or the child support agency objecting to the
laboratory’s choice under this subsection shall:
(1) If the requested frequencies are not available to the
laboratory for the ethnic or racial group requested, provide the
requested frequencies compiled in a manner recognized by
accrediting bodies; or
(2) Engage another laboratory to perform the calculations.
(c) The laboratory may use its own statistical estimate if there
is a question which ethnic or racial group is appropriate. The
laboratory shall calculate the frequencies using statistics, if
available, for any other ethnic or racial group requested.
4. If, after recalculation of the relationship index under
subsection 3 using a different ethnic or racial group, genetic
testing under section 61 of this act does not identify a person as a
genetic parent of a child, the court may require a person who has
been tested to submit to additional genetic testing to identify a
genetic parent.
Sec. 60. 1. A report of genetic testing must be in a record
and signed under penalty of perjury by a designee of the testing
laboratory. A report complying with the requirements of sections
53 to 67, inclusive, of this act is self-authenticating.
2. Documentation from a testing laboratory of the following
information is sufficient to establish a reliable chain of custody
and allow the results of genetic testing to be admissible without
testimony:
(a) The name and photograph of each person whose specimen
has been taken;
(b) The name of the person who collected each specimen;
(c) The place and date each specimen was collected;
(d) The name of the person who received each specimen in the
testing laboratory; and
(e) The date each specimen was received.
Sec. 61. 1. Subject to a challenge under subsection 2, a
person is identified under sections 29 to 90, inclusive, of this act as
a genetic parent of a child if genetic testing complies with sections
53 to 67, inclusive, of this act and the results of the testing
disclose:
(a) The person has at least a 99-percent probability of
parentage, using a prior probability of 0.50, as calculated by using
the combined relationship index obtained in the testing; and
-
*AB424*

– 16 –
(b) A combined relationship index of at least 100 to 1.
2. A person identified under subsection 1 as a genetic parent
of the child may challenge the genetic testing results only by other
genetic testing satisfying the requirements of sections 53 to 67,
inclusive, of this act which:
(a) Excludes the person as a genetic parent of the child; or
(b) Identifies another person as a possible genetic parent of the
child other than:
(1) The person who gave birth to the child; or
(2) The person identified under subsection 1.
3. Except as otherwise provided in section 66 of this act, if
more than one person other than the person who gave birth to the
child is identified by genetic testing as a possible genetic parent of
the child, the court shall order each person to submit to further
genetic testing to identify a genetic parent.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Combined relationship index” means the product of all
tested relationship indices.
(b) “Probability of parentage” means, for the ethnic or racial
group to which a person alleged to be a parent belongs, the
probability that a hypothesized genetic relationship is supported,
compared to the probability that a genetic relationship is
supported between the child and a random person of the ethnic or
racial group used in the hypothesized genetic relationship,
expressed as a percentage incorporating the combined
relationship index and a prior probability.
Sec. 62. 1. Subject to assessment of fees under sections 68
to 88, inclusive, of this act, payment of the cost of initial genetic
testing must be made in advance:
(a) By the person who made the request for genetic testing;
(b) As agreed by the parties; or
(c) As ordered by the court.
2. If the cost of genetic testing is paid by a child support
agency, the agency may seek reimbursement from the genetic
parent whose parent and child relationship is established.
Sec. 63. The court shall order, or a child support agency may
facilitate, additional genetic testing on request of a person who
contests the result of the initial testing under section 61 of this act.
If initial genetic testing under section 61 of this act identified a
person as a genetic parent of the child, the court may not order,
and a child support agency may not facilitate, additional testing
unless the contesting person pays for the testing in advance.
Sec. 64. 1. Subject to subsection 2, if a genetic-testing
specimen is not available from an alleged genetic parent of a
child, a person seeking genetic testing demonstrates good cause
-
*AB424*

– 17 –
and the court finds that the circumstances are just, the court may
order any of the following persons to submit specimens for genetic
testing:
(a) A parent of the alleged genetic parent;
(b) A sibling of the alleged genetic parent;
(c) Another child of the alleged genetic parent and the person
who gave birth to the other child; and
(d) Another relative of the alleged genetic parent necessary to
complete genetic testing.
2. To issue an order under this section, the court must find
that a need for genetic testing outweighs the legitimate interests of
the person sought to be tested.
Sec. 65. If a person seeking genetic testing demonstrates
good cause, the court may order genetic testing of a deceased
person.
Sec. 66. 1. If the court finds there is reason to believe that
an alleged genetic parent has an identical sibling and evidence
that the sibling may be a genetic parent of the child, the court may
order genetic testing of the sibling.
2. If more than one sibling is identified under section 61 of
this act as a genetic parent of the child, the court may rely on
nongenetic evidence to adjudicate which sibling is a genetic parent
of the child.
Sec. 67. 1. Release of a report of genetic testing for
parentage is controlled by law of this State other than sections 29
to 90, inclusive, of this act.
2. A person who intentionally releases an identifiable
specimen of another person collected for genetic testing under
sections 53 to 67, inclusive, of this act for a purpose not relevant to
a proceeding regarding parentage, without a court order or written
permission of the person who furnished the specimen, is guilty of
a misdemeanor.
Sec. 68. 1. A proceeding may be commenced to adjudicate
the parentage of a child. Except as otherwise provided in sections
29 to 90, inclusive, of this act, the proceeding is governed by the
Nevada Rules of Civil Procedure.
2. A proceeding to adjudicate the parentage of a child born
under a gestational agreement is governed by NRS 126.500 to
126.810, inclusive, and sections 91 and 92 of this act.
3. As used in this section, “gestational agreement” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 126.570.
Sec. 69. Except as otherwise provided in sections 39 to 52,
inclusive, and 75 to 78, inclusive, of this act, a proceeding to
adjudicate parentage may be maintained by:
1. The child;
-
*AB424*

– 18 –
2. The person who gave birth to the child, unless a court has
adjudicated that the person who gave birth to the child is not a
parent;
3. A person who is a parent under sections 29 to 90, inclusive,
of this act;
4. A person whose parentage of the child is to be adjudicated;
5. A child support agency or other governmental agency
authorized by law of this State other than sections 29 to 90,
inclusive, of this act;
6. An adoption agency authorized by law of this State other
than sections 29 to 90, inclusive, of this act or licensed child-
placing agency;
7. A representative authorized by law of this State other than
sections 29 to 90, inclusive, of this act to act for a person who
otherwise would be entitled to maintain a proceeding but is
deceased, incapacitated or a minor; or
8. An agency which provides child welfare services in a
proceeding pursuant to chapter 432B of NRS.
Sec. 70. 1. The petitioner shall give notice of a proceeding
to adjudicate parentage to the following persons, if the
whereabouts of the person are known:
(a) The person who gave birth to the child, unless a court has
adjudicated that the person who gave birth to the child is not a
parent;
(b) A person who is a parent of the child under sections 29 to
90, inclusive, of this act;
(c) A presumed, acknowledged or adjudicated parent of the
child; and
(d) A person whose parentage of the child is to be adjudicated.
2. A person entitled to notice under subsection 1 has a right
to intervene in the proceeding.
3. Lack of notice required by subsection 1 does not render a
judgment void. Lack of notice does not preclude a person entitled
to notice under subsection 1 from bringing a proceeding under
subsection 2 of section 78 of this act.
Sec. 71. 1. The court may adjudicate a person’s parentage
of a child only if the court has personal jurisdiction over the
person.
2. A court of this State with jurisdiction to adjudicate
parentage may exercise personal jurisdiction over a nonresident if
the conditions prescribed in NRS 130.201 are satisfied.
3. Lack of jurisdiction over one person does not preclude the
court from making an adjudication of parentage binding on
another person.
-
*AB424*

– 19 –
Sec. 72. Venue for a proceeding to adjudicate parentage is in
the county of this State in which:
1. The child resides or is located;
2. If the child does not reside in this State, the respondent
resides or is located;
3. A proceeding has been commenced for administration of
the estate of a person who is or may be a parent under sections 29
to 90, inclusive, of this act; or
4. A proceeding has been commenced to protect a child from
abuse or neglect pursuant to chapter 432B of NRS.
Sec. 73. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of
section 57 of this act, the court shall admit a report of genetic
testing ordered by the court under section 58 of this act as
evidence of the truth of the facts asserted in the report.
2. A party may object to the admission of a report described
in subsection 1, not later than 14 days after the party receives the
report. The party shall cite specific grounds for exclusion.
3. A party that objects to the results of genetic testing may
call a genetic-testing expert to testify in person or by another
method approved by the court. Unless the court orders otherwise,
the party offering the testimony bears the expense for the expert
testifying.
4. Admissibility of a report of genetic testing is not affected by
whether the testing was performed:
(a) Voluntarily, under an order of the court or as a result of
the facilitation of a child support agency; or
(b) Before, on or after commencement of the proceeding.
Sec. 74. 1. A proceeding to determine whether an alleged
genetic parent who is not a presumed parent is a parent of a child
may be commenced:
(a) Before the child becomes an adult; or
(b) After the child becomes an adult, but only if the child
initiates the proceeding.
2. This subsection applies in a proceeding described in
subsection 1 if the person who gave birth to the child is the only
other person with a claim to parentage of the child. The court
shall adjudicate an alleged genetic parent to be a parent of the
child if the alleged genetic parent:
(a) Is identified under section 61 of this act as a genetic parent
of the child and the identification is not successfully challenged
under section 61 of this act;
(b) Admits parentage in a pleading, when making an
appearance or during a hearing, the court accepts the admission
and the court determines the alleged genetic parent to be a parent
of the child;
-
*AB424*

– 20 –
(c) Declines to submit to genetic testing ordered by the court or
facilitated by a child support agency, in which case the court may
adjudicate the alleged genetic parent to be a parent of the child
even if the alleged genetic parent denies a genetic relationship
with the child;
(d) Is in default after service of process and the court
determines the alleged genetic parent to be a parent of the child;
or
(e) Is neither identified nor excluded as a genetic parent by
genetic testing and, based on other evidence, the court determines
the alleged genetic parent to be a parent of the child.
3. Subject to other limitations in sections 73 to 80, inclusive,
of this act, if in a proceeding involving an alleged genetic parent,
at least one other person in addition to the person who gave birth
to the child has a claim to parentage of the child, the court shall
adjudicate parentage under section 80 of this act.
Sec. 75. 1. A proceeding to determine whether a presumed
parent is a parent of a child may be commenced:
(a) Before the child becomes an adult; or
(b) After the child becomes an adult, but only if the child
initiates the proceeding.
2. A presumption of parentage under section 38 of this act
cannot be overcome after the child attains 2 years of age unless
the court determines:
(a) The presumed parent is not a genetic parent, never resided
with the child and never held out the child as the presumed
parent’s child; or
(b) The child has more than one presumed parent.
3. The following rules apply in a proceeding to adjudicate a
presumed parent’s parentage of a child if the person who gave
birth to the child is the only other person with a claim to parentage
of the child:
(a) If there is not a party to the proceeding who challenges the
presumed parent’s parentage of the child, the court shall
adjudicate the presumed parent to be a parent of the child.
(b) If the presumed parent is identified under section 61 of this
act as a genetic parent of the child and that identification is not
successfully challenged under section 61 of this act, the court
shall adjudicate the presumed parent to be a parent of the child.
(c) If the presumed parent is not identified under section 61 of
this act as a genetic parent of the child and the presumed parent
or the person who gave birth to the child challenges the presumed
parent’s parentage of the child, the court shall adjudicate the
parentage of the child in the best interest of the child based on the
factors under subsections 1 and 2 of section 80 of this act.
-
*AB424*

– 21 –
4. Subject to other limitations in sections 73 to 80, inclusive,
of this act, if in a proceeding to adjudicate a presumed parent’s
parentage of a child, another person in addition to the person who
gave birth to the child asserts a claim to parentage of the child, the
court shall adjudicate parentage under section 80 of this act.
Sec. 76. 1. A proceeding to establish parentage of a child
under this section may be commenced only by a person who:
(a) Is alive when the proceeding is commenced; and
(b) Claims to be a de facto parent of the child.
2. A person who claims to be a de facto parent of a child must
commence a proceeding to establish parentage of a child under
this section:
(a) Before the child attains 18 years of age; and
(b) While the child is alive.
3. The following rules govern standing of a person who
claims to be a de facto parent of a child to maintain a proceeding
under this section:
(a) The person must file an initial verified pleading alleging
specific facts that support the claim to parentage of the child
asserted under this section. The verified pleading must be served
on all parents and legal guardians of the child and any other party
to the proceeding.
(b) An adverse party, parent or legal guardian may file a
pleading in response to the pleading filed under paragraph (a). A
responsive pleading must be verified and must be served on parties
to the proceeding.
(c) Unless the court finds a hearing is necessary to determine
disputed facts material to the issue of standing, the court shall
determine, based on the pleadings under paragraphs (a) and (b),
whether the person has alleged facts sufficient to satisfy by a
preponderance of the evidence the requirements of paragraphs (a)
to (g), inclusive, of subsection 4. If the court holds a hearing
under this subsection, the hearing must be held on an expedited
basis.
4. In a proceeding to adjudicate parentage of a person who
claims to be a de facto parent of the child, if there is only one
other person who is a parent or has a claim to parentage of the
child, the court shall adjudicate the person who claims to be a de
facto parent to be a parent of the child if the person demonstrates
by clear and convincing evidence that:
(a) The person resided with the child as a regular member of
the child’s household for a significant period;
(b) The person engaged in consistent caretaking of the child;
-
*AB424*

– 22 –
(c) The person undertook full and permanent responsibilities
of a parent of the child without expectation of financial
compensation;
(d) The person held out the child as the person’s child;
(e) The person established a bonded and dependent
relationship with the child which is parental in nature;
(f) Another parent of the child fostered or supported the
bonded and dependent relationship required under paragraph (e);
and
(g) Continuing the relationship between the person and the
child is in the best interest of the child.
5. Subject to other limitations in sections 73 to 80, inclusive,
of this act, if in a proceeding to adjudicate parentage of a person
who claims to be a de facto parent of the child, there is more than
one other person who is a parent or has a claim to parentage of
the child and the court determines that the requirements of
subsection 4 are satisfied, the court shall adjudicate parentage
under section 80 of this act.
Sec. 77. 1. If a child has an acknowledged parent, a
proceeding to challenge the acknowledgment of parentage or a
denial of parentage, brought by a signatory to the
acknowledgment or denial, is governed by sections 47 and 48 of
this act.
2. If a child has an acknowledged parent, the following rules
apply in a proceeding to challenge the acknowledgment of
parentage or a denial of parentage brought by a person, other
than the child, who has standing under section 69 of this act and
was not a signatory to the acknowledgment or denial:
(a) The person must commence the proceeding not later than 2
years after the effective date of the acknowledgment.
(b) The court may permit the proceeding only if the court finds
permitting the proceeding is in the best interest of the child.
(c) If the court permits the proceeding, the court shall
adjudicate parentage under section 79 of this act.
Sec. 78. 1. If a child has an adjudicated parent, a
proceeding to challenge the adjudication, brought by a person who
was a party to the adjudication or received notice under section 70
of this act, is governed by the rules governing a collateral attack
on a judgment.
2. If a child has an adjudicated parent, the following rules
apply to a proceeding to challenge the adjudication of parentage
brought by a person, other than the child, who has standing under
section 69 of this act and was not a party to the adjudication and
did not receive notice under section 70 of this act:
-
*AB424*

– 23 –
(a) The person must commence the proceeding not later than 2
years after the effective date of the adjudication.
(b) The court may permit the proceeding only if the court finds
permitting the proceeding is in the best interest of the child.
(c) If the court permits the proceeding, the court shall
adjudicate parentage under section 80 of this act.
Sec. 79. 1. A person who is a parent under NRS 126.500 to
126.810, inclusive, and sections 91 and 92 of this act or the person
who gave birth to the child may bring a proceeding to adjudicate
parentage. If the court determines the person is a parent under
NRS 126.500 to 126.810, inclusive, and sections 91 and 92 of this
act, the court shall adjudicate the person to be a parent of the
child.
2. In a proceeding to adjudicate a person’s parentage of a
child, if another person other than the person who gave birth to
the child is a parent under NRS 126.500 to 126.810, inclusive, and
sections 91 and 92 of this act, the court shall adjudicate the
person’s parentage of the child under section 80 of this act.
Sec. 80. 1. In a proceeding to adjudicate competing claims
of, or challenges under subsection 3 of section 75 of this act or
section 77 or 78 of this act, to parentage of a child by two or more
persons, the court shall adjudicate parentage in the best interest of
the child, based on:
(a) The age of the child;
(b) The length of time during which each person assumed the
role of parent of the child;
(c) The nature of the relationship between the child and each
person;
(d) The harm to the child if the relationship between the child
and each person is not recognized;
(e) The basis for each person’s claim to parentage of the child;
and
(f) Other equitable factors arising from the disruption of the
relationship between the child and each person or the likelihood of
other harm to the child.
2. If a person challenges parentage based on the results of
genetic testing, in addition to the factors listed in subsection 1, the
court shall consider:
(a) The facts surrounding the discovery the person might not
be a genetic parent of the child; and
(b) The length of time between the time that the person was
placed on notice that the person might not be a genetic parent and
the commencement of the proceeding.
3. The court may adjudicate a child to have more than two
parents under sections 29 to 90, inclusive, of this act if the court
-
*AB424*

– 24 –
finds that failure to recognize more than two parents would be
detrimental to the child. A finding of detriment to the child does
not require a finding of unfitness of any parent or person seeking
an adjudication of parentage. In determining detriment to the
child, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including the
harm if the child is removed from a stable placement with a person
who has fulfilled the child’s physical needs and psychological
needs for care and affection and has assumed the role for a
substantial period.
Sec. 81. 1. In a proceeding under sections 68 to 88,
inclusive, of this act, the court may issue a temporary order for
child support if the order is consistent with the law of this State
other than sections 29 to 90, inclusive, of this act and the person
ordered to pay support is:
(a) A presumed parent of the child;
(b) Petitioning to be adjudicated a parent;
(c) Identified as a genetic parent through genetic testing under
section 61 of this act;
(d) An alleged genetic parent who has declined to submit to
genetic testing;
(e) Shown by clear and convincing evidence to be a parent of
the child; or
(f) A parent under sections 29 to 90, inclusive, of this act.
2. A temporary order may include a provision for custody and
visitation under law of this State other than sections 29 to 90,
inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 82. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
the court may combine a proceeding to adjudicate parentage
under sections 29 to 90, inclusive, of this act with a proceeding for
adoption, termination of parental rights, protection of a child from
abuse or neglect pursuant to chapter 432B of NRS, child custody
or visitation, child support, divorce, dissolution, annulment,
declaration of invalidity, legal separation or separate
maintenance, administration of an estate or other appropriate
proceeding.
2. A respondent may not combine a proceeding described in
subsection 1 with a proceeding to adjudicate parentage brought
under NRS 130.0902 to 130.802, inclusive.
Sec. 83. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 126.500 to
126.810, inclusive, and sections 91 and 92 of this act, a proceeding
to adjudicate parentage may be commenced before the birth of the
child and an order or judgment may be entered before birth, but
enforcement of the order or judgment must be stayed until the
birth of the child.
-
*AB424*

– 25 –
Sec. 84. 1. A minor child is a permissive party but not a
necessary party to a proceeding under sections 68 to 88, inclusive,
of this act.
2. The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem to represent a
child in a proceeding under sections 68 to 88, inclusive, of this act
if the court finds that the interests of the child are not adequately
represented.
Sec. 85. The court shall adjudicate parentage of a child
without a jury.
Sec. 86. The court may dismiss a proceeding under sections
29 to 90, inclusive, of this act for want of prosecution only without
prejudice. An order of dismissal for want of prosecution
purportedly with prejudice is void and has only the effect of a
dismissal without prejudice.
Sec. 87. 1. An order adjudicating parentage must identify
the child in a manner provided by law of this State other than
sections 29 to 90, inclusive, of this act.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the court
may assess filing fees, reasonable attorney’s fees, fees for genetic
testing, other costs and necessary travel and other reasonable
expenses incurred in a proceeding under sections 68 to 88,
inclusive, of this act. Attorney’s fees awarded under this
subsection may be paid directly to the attorney and the attorney
may enforce the order in the attorney’s own name.
3. The court may not assess fees, costs or expenses in a
proceeding under sections 68 to 88, inclusive, of this act against a
child support agency of this State or another state, except as
provided by law of this State other than sections 29 to 90,
inclusive, of this act.
4. In a proceeding under sections 68 to 88, inclusive, of this
act, a copy of a bill for genetic testing or prenatal or postnatal
health care for the person who gave birth to the child and the
child, that is provided to the adverse party, excluding a child
support agency, not later than 10 days before a hearing, is
admissible to establish:
(a) The amount of the charge billed; and
(b) That the charge is reasonable and necessary.
5. On request of a party and for good cause, the court in a
proceeding under sections 68 to 88, inclusive, of this act may order
the name of the child changed. If the court order changing the
name varies from the name on the birth certificate of the child, the
court shall order the State Registrar of Vital Statistics to issue an
amended birth certificate.
Sec. 88. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2:
-
*AB424*

– 26 –
(a) A signatory to an acknowledgment of parentage or denial
of parentage is bound by the acknowledgment and denial as
provided in sections 39 to 52, inclusive, of this act; and
(b) A party to an adjudication of parentage by a court acting
under circumstances that satisfy the jurisdiction requirements of
NRS 130.201 and any person who received notice of the
proceeding are bound by the adjudication.
2. A child is not bound by a determination of parentage under
sections 29 to 90, inclusive, of this act unless:
(a) The determination was based on an unrescinded
acknowledgment of parentage and the acknowledgment is
consistent with the results of genetic testing;
(b) The determination was based on a finding consistent with
the results of genetic testing, and the consistency is declared in the
determination or otherwise shown;
(c) The determination of parentage was made under NRS
126.500 to 126.810, inclusive, and sections 91 and 92 of this act;
or
(d) The child was a party or was represented by a guardian ad
litem in the proceeding.
3. In a proceeding for divorce, dissolution, annulment,
declaration of invalidity, legal separation or separate
maintenance, the court is deemed to have made an adjudication of
parentage of a child if the court acts under circumstances that
satisfy the jurisdiction requirements of NRS 130.201 and the final
order:
(a) Expressly identifies the child as a “child of the marriage”
or “issue of the marriage” or includes similar words indicating
that both spouses are parents of the child; or
(b) Provides for support of the child by a spouse or domestic
partner unless that spouse’s or domestic partner’s parentage of
the child is disclaimed specifically in the order.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 or section 78
of this act, a determination of parentage may be asserted as a
defense in a subsequent proceeding seeking to adjudicate
parentage of a person who was not a party to the earlier
proceeding.
5. A party to an adjudication of parentage may challenge the
adjudication only under law of this State other than sections 29 to
90, inclusive, of this act relating to appeal, vacation of judgment
or other judicial review.
Sec. 89. In applying and construing this uniform act,
consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of
the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.
-
*AB424*

– 27 –
Sec. 90. Sections 29 to 90, inclusive, of this act modify, limit
and supersede the Electronic Signatures in Global and National
Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. §§ 7001 et seq., but do not modify, limit
or supersede Section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001(c), or
authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in
Section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. § 7003(b).
Sec. 91. 1. If a person who intends to be a parent of a child
conceived by assisted reproduction dies during the period between
the transfer of a gamete or embryo and the birth of the child, the
person’s death does not preclude the establishment of the person’s
parentage of the child if the person otherwise would be a parent of
the child under sections 29 to 90, inclusive, of this act.
2. If a person who consented in a record to assisted
reproduction by a person who agreed to give birth to a child dies
before a transfer of gametes or embryos, the deceased person is a
parent of a child conceived by the assisted reproduction only if:
(a) Either:
(1) The person consented in a record that if assisted
reproduction were to occur after the death of the person, the
person would be a parent of the child; or
(2) The person’s intent to be a parent of a child conceived
by assisted reproduction after the person’s death is established by
clear and convincing evidence; and
(b) Either:
(1) The embryo is in utero not later than 36 months after
the person’s death; or
(2) The child is born not later than 45 months after the
person’s death.
3. An intended parent is not a parent of a child conceived by
assisted reproduction under a gestational agreement if the
intended parent dies before the transfer of a gamete or embryo
unless:
(a) The agreement provides otherwise; and
(b) The transfer of a gamete or embryo occurs not later than
36 months after the death of the intended parent or birth of the
child occurs not later than 45 months after the death of the
intended parent.
Sec. 92. 1. A party to a gestational agreement may
terminate the agreement, at any time before an embryo transfer,
by giving notice of termination in a record to all other parties. If
an embryo transfer does not result in a pregnancy, a party may
terminate the agreement at any time before a subsequent embryo
transfer.
2. Unless a gestational agreement provides otherwise, on
termination of the agreement under subsection 1, the parties are
-
*AB424*

– 28 –
released from the agreement, except that each intended parent
remains responsible for expenses that are reimbursable under the
agreement and incurred by the gestational carrier through the
date of termination.
3. Except in a case involving fraud, neither a gestational
carrier nor the gestational carrier’s spouse, domestic partner or
former spouse or domestic partner, if any, is liable to the intended
parent or parents for a penalty or liquidated damages, for
terminating a gestational agreement under this section.
Sec. 93. NRS 126.036 is hereby amended to read as follows:
126.036 1. The liberty interest of a parent in the care, custody
and management of the parent’s child is a fundamental right.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(a) Authorize a parent to engage in any unlawful conduct or to
abuse or neglect a child in violation of the laws of this State.
(b) Prohibit courts, law enforcement officers or employees of an
agency which provides child welfare services from acting in their
official capacity within the scope of their authority.
3. Except as otherwise provided by specific statute, the
provisions of this section apply to any statute, local ordinance or
regulation and the implementation of such statute, local ordinance
or regulation regardless of whether such statute, local ordinance or
regulation was adopted or effective before, on or after October 1,
2013.
[4. As used in this section, “agency which provides child
welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 432B.030.]
Sec. 94. NRS 126.151 is hereby amended to read as follows:
126.151 1. [An action under this chapter is a civil action
governed by the Nevada Rules of Civil Procedure. The mother of
the child and the alleged father are competent to testify and may be
compelled to testify. Subsections 3 and 4 of NRS 126.111 and NRS
126.121 and 126.131 apply.
2.] In an action against an alleged [father,] genetic parent,
evidence offered by the alleged [father] genetic parent with respect
to [a man] another person who is not subject to the jurisdiction of
the court concerning that [man’s] person’s sexual intercourse with
the [mother] person who gave birth to the child at or about the
probable time of conception of the child is admissible in evidence
only if the alleged [father] genetic parent has undergone and made
available to the court [blood tests or tests for genetic identification,]
the results of genetic testing performed pursuant to sections 53 to
67, inclusive, of this act which show a probability less than 99
percent that the alleged [father] genetic parent is [the father] a
genetic parent of the child.
[3.] 2. The trial must be by the court without a jury.
-
*AB424*

– 29 –
Sec. 95. NRS 126.161 is hereby amended to read as follows:
126.161 1. A judgment or order of a court, or a judgment or
order entered pursuant to an expedited process, determining the
existence or nonexistence of the relationship of parent and child is
determinative for all purposes.
2. If such a judgment or order of this State is at variance with
the child’s birth certificate, the judgment or order must direct that a
new birth certificate be issued as provided in NRS 440.270 to
440.340, inclusive.
3. If the child is a minor, such a judgment or order of this State
must provide for the child’s support as required by chapter 125B of
NRS and must include an order directing the withholding or
assignment of income for the payment of the support unless:
(a) One of the parties demonstrates and good cause is found by
the court, or pursuant to the expedited process, for the postponement
of the withholding or assignment; or
(b) All parties otherwise agree in writing.
4. Such a judgment or order of this State may:
(a) Contain any other provision directed against the appropriate
party to the proceeding, concerning the duty of support, the custody
and guardianship of the child, visitation with the child, the
furnishing of bond or other security for the payment of the
judgment, or any other matter in the best interest of the child.
(b) Direct [the father] a parent to pay the reasonable expenses of
the [mother’s] pregnancy and confinement [.] of the person who
gave birth to the child. The court may limit the [father’s] liability of
a parent for past support of the child to the proportion of the
expenses already incurred which the court deems just.
5. A court that enters such a judgment or order shall ensure that
the social security numbers of the [mother and father] parents are:
(a) Provided to the Division of Welfare and Supportive Services
of the Department of Health and Human Services.
(b) Placed in the records relating to the matter and, except as
otherwise required to carry out a specific statute, maintained in a
confidential manner.
6. A judgment or order issued pursuant to this chapter within a
proceeding held pursuant to chapter 432B of NRS:
(a) Is not subject to the provisions relating to the confidentiality
of judgments or orders set forth in chapter 432B of NRS; and
(b) Is a final order.
7. As used in this section, “expedited process” means [a
voluntary acknowledgment of paternity developed by the State
Board of Health pursuant to NRS 440.283,] a voluntary
acknowledgment of parentage developed by the State Board of
Health pursuant to NRS 440.285, judicial procedure or an
-
*AB424*

– 30 –
administrative procedure established by this or another state, as that
term is defined in NRS 130.10179, to facilitate the collection of an
obligation for the support of a child.
Sec. 96. NRS 126.201 is hereby amended to read as follows:
126.201 1. [At the pretrial hearing and in further
proceedings,] In any proceeding held pursuant to this chapter, any
party may be represented by counsel. If a party is financially unable
to obtain counsel, the court may appoint counsel to represent that
party with respect to the determination of the existence or
nonexistence of the parent and child relationship and the duty of
support, including , without limitation , the expenses of the
[mother’s] pregnancy and confinement [,] of the person who gave
birth to the child, medical expenses for the birth of the child and
support of the child from birth until trial.
2. If a party is financially unable to pay the cost of a transcript,
the court shall furnish on request a transcript for purposes of appeal.
Sec. 97. NRS 126.291 is hereby amended to read as follows:
126.291 1. Proceedings to compel support by a
nonsupporting parent may be brought in accordance with this
chapter. They are not exclusive of other proceedings. The court may
assess the usual filing fees, charges or court costs against the
nonsupporting parent and shall enforce their collection with the
other provisions of the judgment.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, when the
district attorney is requested to bring an action to compel support or
an action to determine [paternity,] parentage, the district attorney
may charge the requester a fee of not more than $20 for an
application. This fee may not be assessed against:
(a) The State of Nevada when acting as a party to an action
brought pursuant to this chapter.
(b) Any person or agency requesting services pursuant to
chapter 130 of NRS.
3. If the court finds that a parent and child relationship exists, it
may assess against the nonsupporting parent, in addition to any
support obligation ordered a reasonable collection fee. If the court
finds that the nonsupporting parent would experience a financial
hardship if required to pay the fee immediately, it may order that the
fee be paid in installments, each of which is not more than 25
percent of the support obligation for each month.
4. All fees collected pursuant to this section must be deposited
in the general fund of the county and an equivalent amount must be
allocated to augment the county’s program for the enforcement of
support obligations.
-
*AB424*

– 31 –
5. As used in this section, “nonsupporting parent” means the
parent of a child who has failed to provide an equitable share of
his or her child’s necessary maintenance, education and support.
Sec. 98. NRS 126.500 is hereby amended to read as follows:
126.500 As used in NRS 126.500 to 126.810, inclusive, and
sections 91 and 92 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires,
the words and terms defined in NRS [126.510] 126.520 to
[126.630,] 126.580, inclusive, have the meanings ascribed to them
in those sections.
Sec. 99. NRS 126.660 is hereby amended to read as follows:
126.660 1. A donor is not a parent of a child conceived by
means of assisted reproduction.
2. The consent of the spouse or domestic partner of a person
who wishes to be a donor is not required for the person to be a
donor.
Sec. 100. NRS 126.670 is hereby amended to read as follows:
126.670 A person who provides gametes for, or consents to,
assisted reproduction by [a woman,] the person giving birth to the
child as provided in NRS 126.680, with the intent to be a parent of
[her] the child , is a parent of the resulting child.
Sec. 101. NRS 126.680 is hereby amended to read as follows:
126.680 1. [Consent] Except as otherwise provided in
subsection 2, consent by a person who intends to be a parent of a
child born by assisted reproduction must be in a [declaration for the
voluntary acknowledgment of parentage, signed pursuant to NRS
126.053.] record signed by the person giving birth to the child and
the person who intends to be a parent of the child.
2. Failure [of a person to sign a declaration for the voluntary
acknowledgment of parentage] to consent in a record as required
by subsection 1, before or after the birth of the child, does not
preclude a finding of parentage if [the woman and] the person [,
during] who intends to be a parent of the child or the person giving
birth to the child:
(a) Proves by clear and convincing evidence the existence of
an express agreement entered into by the person who intends to be
a parent of the child and the person giving birth to the child,
before the conception of the child, that the person who intends to
be a parent of the child and the person giving birth to the child
intended that they both would be parents of the child; or
(b) During the first 2 years of the child’s life, including any
period of temporary absence, resided together in the same
household with the child and openly held out the child as their own.
Sec. 102. NRS 126.690 is hereby amended to read as follows:
126.690 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the
legal spouse or domestic partner of a [woman] person who gives
-
*AB424*

– 32 –
birth to a child by means of assisted reproduction may not challenge
the parentage of the child unless:
(a) Within 2 years after learning of the birth of the child, a
proceeding is commenced to adjudicate parentage; and
(b) The court finds that, before or after the birth of the child, the
legal spouse or domestic partner did not consent to the assisted
reproduction.
2. A proceeding to adjudicate parentage may be maintained at
any time if the court determines that:
(a) The legal spouse or domestic partner did not provide
gametes for, or consent to, the assisted reproduction by the person
who gave birth [;] to the child;
(b) The legal spouse or domestic partner and the [woman]
person who gave birth to the child have not cohabited since the
probable time of the assisted reproduction; and
(c) The legal spouse or domestic partner never openly held out
the child as his or her own.
Sec. 103. NRS 126.700 is hereby amended to read as follows:
126.700 1. If a marriage or domestic partnership is dissolved
or terminated before the transfer of [eggs, sperm or] embryos, the
former spouse or former domestic partner is not a parent of the
resulting child unless the former spouse or former domestic partner
consented in a record that if assisted reproduction were to occur
after a dissolution or termination, the former spouse or former
domestic partner would be a parent of the child.
2. The consent of a person to assisted reproduction may be
withdrawn by that person in a record at any time before [placement]
transfer of the [eggs, sperm or] embryos.
Sec. 104. NRS 126.710 is hereby amended to read as follows:
126.710 1. A prospective gestational carrier, [her] the legal
spouse or domestic partner , if [she is married or in a domestic
partnership,] any, of the prospective gestational carrier, a donor or
the donors and the intended parent or parents may enter into a
written agreement providing that:
(a) The prospective gestational carrier agrees to pregnancy by
means of assisted reproduction;
(b) The prospective gestational carrier, [her] the legal spouse or
domestic partner , if [she is married or in a domestic partnership,]
any, of the prospective gestational carrier, and the donor or donors
relinquish all rights and duties as the parents of a child conceived
through assisted reproduction; and
(c) The intended parent or parents become the parent or parents
of any resulting child.
2. If two persons are the intended parents, both of the intended
parents must be parties to the gestational agreement.
-
*AB424*

– 33 –
3. A gestational agreement is enforceable only if it satisfies the
requirements of NRS 126.750.
4. A gestational agreement may provide for payment of
consideration pursuant to NRS 126.800 and 126.810.
Sec. 105. NRS 126.720 is hereby amended to read as follows:
126.720 Except as otherwise provided in section 91 of this
act:
1. If a gestational carrier arrangement satisfies the requirements
of NRS 126.740 and 126.750:
(a) The intended parent or parents shall be considered the parent
or parents of the resulting child immediately upon the birth of the
child;
(b) The resulting child shall be considered the child of the
intended parent or parents immediately upon the birth of the child;
(c) Parental rights vest in the intended parent or parents
immediately upon the birth of the resulting child;
(d) Sole legal and physical custody of the resulting child vest
with the intended parent or parents immediately upon the birth of
the child; and
(e) Neither the gestational carrier nor [her] the legal spouse or
domestic partner, if any, of the gestational carrier shall be
considered the parent of the resulting child.
2. If a gestational carrier arrangement satisfies the requirements
of NRS 126.740 and 126.750 and if, because of a laboratory error,
the resulting child is not genetically related to the intended parent or
either of the intended parents or any donor who donated to the
intended parent or parents, the intended parent or parents shall be
considered the parent or parents of the child, unless a determination
to the contrary is made by a court of competent jurisdiction in an
action which may only be brought by one or more genetic parents of
the resulting child within 60 days after the birth of the child.
3. The parties to a gestational carrier arrangement shall assume
the rights and obligations of subsections 1 and 2 if:
(a) The gestational carrier satisfies the eligibility requirements
set forth in subsection 1 of NRS 126.740;
(b) The intended parent or parents satisfy the requirement set
forth in subsection 2 of NRS 126.740; and
(c) The gestational carrier arrangement occurs pursuant to a
gestational agreement which meets the requirements set forth in
NRS 126.750.
4. Before or after the birth of the resulting child, the intended
parent or parents or the prospective gestational carrier or gestational
carrier may commence a proceeding in any district court in this
State to obtain an order designating the content of the birth
-
*AB424*

– 34 –
certificate issued as provided in NRS 440.270 to 440.340, inclusive.
If:
(a) A copy of the gestational agreement is attached to the
petition;
(b) The requirements of NRS 126.740 and 126.750 are satisfied;
and
(c) Any of the following applies:
(1) The resulting child is anticipated to be born in this State;
(2) The resulting child was born in this State;
(3) The intended parent or parents reside in this State;
(4) The intended parent or parents resided in this State when
the gestational agreement was executed;
(5) The gestational carrier resides in this State;
(6) The gestational agreement was executed in this State; or
(7) The medical procedures for assisted reproduction that
were performed pursuant to the gestational agreement and resulted
in pregnancy were performed in this State,
 the court may issue an order validating the gestational agreement
and declaring the intended parent or parents to be the parent or
parents of the resulting child.
Sec. 106. NRS 126.740 is hereby amended to read as follows:
126.740 1. A prospective gestational carrier is eligible to be a
gestational carrier pursuant to NRS 126.710 to 126.810, inclusive,
and sections 91 and 92 of this act if, at the time the gestational
agreement is executed, [she:] the prospective gestational carrier:
(a) Has completed a medical evaluation relating to the
anticipated pregnancy;
(b) Has undergone legal consultation with independent legal
counsel regarding the terms of the gestational agreement and the
potential legal consequences of the gestational carrier arrangement;
and
(c) Did not contribute any gametes that will ultimately result in
an embryo that [she] the gestational carrier will attempt to carry to
term.
2. The intended parent or parents shall be deemed to have
satisfied the requirements of NRS 126.710 to 126.810, inclusive,
and sections 91 and 92 of this act if, before the gestational carrier
agreement is executed, [he, she or they] the intended parent or
parents have undergone legal consultation with independent legal
counsel regarding the terms of the gestational agreement and the
potential legal consequences of the gestational carrier arrangement.
Sec. 107. NRS 126.750 is hereby amended to read as follows:
126.750 1. A gestational agreement is enforceable only if it
satisfies the requirements of this section.
-
*AB424*

– 35 –
2. The gestational carrier and the intended parent or parents
must be represented by separate, independent counsel in all matters
concerning the gestational carrier arrangement and gestational
agreement.
3. A gestational agreement must:
(a) Be in writing;
(b) Be executed before the commencement of any medical
procedures in furtherance of the gestational carrier arrangement,
other than the medical evaluation required by subsection 1 of NRS
126.740 to determine the eligibility of the gestational carrier, by:
(1) A gestational carrier satisfying the eligibility
requirements set forth in subsection 1 of NRS 126.740 and the legal
spouse or domestic partner , if any, of the gestational carrier ; [, if
any;] and
(2) An intended parent or parents satisfying the requirement
set forth in subsection 2 of NRS 126.740;
(c) Be notarized and signed by all the parties with attached
declarations of the independent attorney of each party; and
(d) Include the separate, written and signed acknowledgment of
the gestational carrier and the intended parent or parents stating that
he or she has received information about the legal, financial and
contractual rights, expectations, penalties and obligations of the
gestational agreement.
4. A gestational agreement must provide for:
(a) The express written agreement of the gestational carrier to:
(1) Undergo embryo or gamete transfer and , subject to the
provisions of subsection 6, attempt to carry and give birth to any
resulting child; and
(2) [Surrender legal and physical custody of any resulting
child to the] Acknowledge that each intended parent [or parents
immediately upon the birth] is the legal and physical custodian of
[the] any resulting child;
(b) The express written agreement of the legal spouse or
domestic partner, if any, of the gestational carrier to:
(1) Undertake the obligations imposed upon the gestational
carrier pursuant to the terms of the gestational agreement; and
(2) [Surrender legal and physical custody of any resulting
child to the] Acknowledge that each intended parent [or parents
immediately upon the birth] is the legal and physical custodian of
[the] any resulting child;
(c) The express written agreement of each party to the use by the
gestational carrier of the services of a physician [of her choosing,]
chosen by the gestational carrier, after consultation with the
intended parent or parents, to provide care to the gestational carrier
during the pregnancy; and
-
*AB424*

– 36 –
(d) The express written agreement of the intended parent or
parents to:
(1) Accept legal and physical custody of any resulting child
not biologically related to the gestational carrier or [her] the spouse
or domestic partner, if any, of the gestational carrier immediately
upon the birth of the child or children regardless of the number,
gender or mental or physical condition of the child or children; and
(2) Assume sole responsibility for the support of any
resulting child not biologically related to the gestational carrier or
[her] the spouse or domestic partner, if any, of the gestational
carrier immediately upon the birth of the child.
5. A gestational agreement is enforceable even if it contains
one or more of the following provisions:
(a) The gestational carrier’s agreement to undergo all medical
examinations, treatments and fetal monitoring procedures
recommended for the success of the pregnancy by the physician
providing care to the gestational carrier during the pregnancy.
(b) The gestational carrier’s agreement to abstain from any
activities that the intended parent or parents or the physician
providing care to the gestational carrier during the pregnancy
reasonably believes to be harmful to the pregnancy and the future
health of any resulting child, including, without limitation, smoking,
drinking alcohol, using nonprescribed drugs, using prescription
drugs not authorized by a physician aware of the pregnancy,
exposure to radiation or any other activity proscribed by a health
care provider.
(c) The agreement of the intended parent or parents to pay the
gestational carrier reasonable compensation.
(d) The agreement of the intended parent or parents to pay for or
reimburse the gestational carrier for reasonable expenses, including,
without limitation, medical, legal or other professional expenses,
related to the gestational carrier arrangement and the gestational
agreement.
6. A gestational carrier has the right to make all health and
welfare decisions regarding the gestational carrier and the
pregnancy of the gestational carrier, including, without limitation,
whether to consent to a cesarean section or the transfer of
multiple embryos, whether to use the services of a health care
practitioner chosen by the gestational carrier, whether to
terminate or continue the pregnancy and whether to reduce or
retain the number of fetuses or embryos carried by the gestational
carrier. Any provision in a gestational agreement that contradicts
such a right is void and unenforceable.
-
*AB424*

– 37 –
Sec. 108. NRS 126.770 is hereby amended to read as follows:
126.770 1. Unless a gestational agreement expressly
provides otherwise:
(a) The marriage or domestic partnership of a gestational carrier
after [she executes a] the gestational agreement is signed by all
parties does not affect the validity of the [gestational] agreement .
[and:
1.] The consent of the [legal] spouse or domestic partner of the
gestational carrier to the [gestational] agreement is not required [.
2. The legal] , and the spouse or domestic partner of the
gestational carrier [must] is not [be] a presumed [to be the] parent of
[any resulting] a child [.] conceived by assisted reproduction under
the agreement.
(b) The divorce, dissolution, annulment, declaration of
invalidity, legal separation or separate maintenance of the
gestational carrier after the agreement is signed by all parties does
not affect the validity of the agreement.
2. Unless a gestational agreement expressly provides
otherwise:
(a) The marriage or domestic partnership of an intended
parent after the agreement is signed by all parties does not affect
the validity of the agreement. The consent of the spouse or
domestic partner of the intended parent to the agreement is not
required, and the spouse or domestic partner of the intended
parent is not, based on the agreement, a parent of a child
conceived by assisted reproduction under the agreement.
(b) The divorce, dissolution, annulment, declaration of
invalidity, legal separation or separate maintenance of an
intended parent after the agreement is signed by all parties does
not affect the validity of the agreement and the intended parents
are the parents of a child conceived by assisted reproduction under
the agreement.
Sec. 109. NRS 126.780 is hereby amended to read as follows:
126.780 1. A gestational carrier, [her] the legal spouse or
domestic partner, if any, of the gestational carrier or the intended
parent or parents are in noncompliance when [he, she or they
breach] any such person breaches any provision of the gestational
agreement or [fail] fails to meet any of the requirements of NRS
126.710 to 126.810, inclusive [.] , and sections 91 and 92 of this
act.
2. In the event of noncompliance, a court of competent
jurisdiction shall determine the respective rights and obligations of
the parties to the gestational agreement [based solely] :
(a) If the agreement substantially complies with NRS 126.710
to 126.810, inclusive, and sections 91 and 92 of this act, based on
-
*AB424*

– 38 –
the evidence of the [original] intent of the parties [.] at the time of
execution of the agreement and other relevant evidence.
(b) If the agreement does not substantially comply with NRS
126.710 to 126.810, inclusive, and sections 91 and 92 of this act,
pursuant to other applicable law of this State.
3. [There must be no specific] Specific performance is not an
available remedy [available for breach of the] except to enforce any
provision in a gestational agreement [by the gestational carrier that
would require the gestational carrier to be impregnated.] that is
necessary to enable the intended parents to exercise the full rights
of parentage immediately upon the birth of the child, if the
intended parents are being prevented from exercising such rights.
Sec. 110. NRS 128.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
128.150 1. If a [mother] person who gave birth to a child
relinquishes or proposes to relinquish the child for adoption [a] and
the child [who] has:
(a) A presumed [father] parent pursuant to [NRS 126.051;]
section 38 of this act;
(b) A [father] parent whose relationship to the child has been
determined by a court; or
(c) A [father] parent as to whom the child is a legitimate child
under chapter 126 of NRS, under prior law of this State or under the
law of another jurisdiction,
 and the [father] parent has not consented to the adoption of the
child or relinquished the child for adoption, a proceeding must be
brought pursuant to this chapter and a determination made of
whether a parent and child relationship exists and, if so, if it should
be terminated.
2. If a [mother] person who gave birth to a child relinquishes
or proposes to relinquish the child for adoption [a] and the child
[who] does not have:
(a) A presumed [father] parent pursuant to [NRS 126.051;]
section 38 of this act;
(b) A [father] parent whose relationship to the child has been
determined by a court;
(c) A [father] parent as to whom the child is a legitimate child
under chapter 126 of NRS, under prior law of this State or under the
law of another jurisdiction; or
(d) A [father] parent who can be identified in any other way,
 or if a child otherwise becomes the subject of an adoption
proceeding, the agency or person to whom the child has been or is to
be relinquished, or the [mother] person who gave birth to the child
or the person having custody of the child, shall file a petition in the
district court to terminate the parental rights of the [father,] other
-
*AB424*

– 39 –
parent, unless the [father’s] other parent’s relationship to the child
has been previously terminated or determined not to exist by a court.
3. In an effort to identify and protect the interests of the
[natural father,] other parent, the court which is conducting a
proceeding pursuant to this chapter shall cause inquiry to be made of
the [mother] person who gave birth to the child and any other
appropriate person. The inquiry must include the following:
(a) Whether the [mother] person who gave birth to the child
was married or in a domestic partnership at the time of conception
of the child or at any time thereafter.
(b) Whether the [mother] person who gave birth to the child
was cohabiting with [a man] another person at the time of
conception or birth of the child.
(c) Whether the [mother] person who gave birth to the child has
received support payments or promises of support with respect to
the child or in connection with [her] the pregnancy [.] of the person.
(d) Whether any [man] person has formally or informally
acknowledged or declared [his] their possible [paternity] parentage
of the child.
4. If, after the inquiry, the [natural father] other parent is
identified to the satisfaction of the court, or if more than one [man]
person is identified as a possible [father,] parent, each must be
given notice of the proceeding in accordance with subsection 6 or
with this chapter, as applicable. If any of them fails to appear or, if
appearing, fails to claim custodial rights, such failure constitutes
abandonment of the child. If the [natural father] other parent or a
[man] person representing [himself] themselves to be the [natural
father,] other parent, claims custodial rights, the court shall proceed
to determine custodial rights.
5. If, after the inquiry, the court is unable to identify the
[natural father] other parent or any possible [natural father] other
parent and no person has appeared claiming to be the [natural
father] other parent and claiming custodial rights, the court shall
enter an order terminating the unknown [natural father’s] person’s
parental rights with reference to the child. Subject to the disposition
of any appeal, upon the expiration of 6 months after an order
terminating parental rights is issued under this subsection, or this
chapter, the order cannot be questioned by any person in any
manner or upon any ground, including fraud, misrepresentation,
failure to give any required notice or lack of jurisdiction of the
parties or of the subject matter.
6. Notice of the proceeding must be given to every person
identified as [the natural father] a parent or a possible [natural
father] parent in the manner provided by law and the Nevada Rules
of Civil Procedure for the service of process in a civil action, or in
-
*AB424*

– 40 –
any manner the court directs. Proof of giving the notice must be
filed with the court before the petition is heard.
Sec. 111. NRS 130.316 is hereby amended to read as follows:
130.316 1. The physical presence of a nonresident party who
is a natural person in a tribunal of this State is not required for the
establishment, enforcement or modification of a support order or the
rendition of a judgment determining parentage of a child.
2. An affidavit, a document substantially complying with
federally mandated forms or a document incorporated by reference
in any of them, which would not be excluded under the hearsay rule
in NRS 51.065 if given in person, is admissible in evidence if given
under penalty of perjury by a party or witness residing outside this
State.
3. A copy of the record of child-support payments certified as a
true copy of the original by the custodian of the record may be
forwarded to a responding tribunal. The copy is evidence of facts
asserted therein and is admissible to show whether payments were
made.
4. Copies of bills for testing for parentage of a child, and for
prenatal and postnatal health care of the [mother] person who gave
birth to the child and the child, furnished to the adverse party at
least 20 days before trial are admissible in evidence to prove the
amount of the charges billed and that the charges were reasonable,
necessary and customary.
5. Documentary evidence transmitted from outside this State to
a tribunal of this State by telephone, telecopier or other electronic
means that do not provide an original record may not be excluded
from evidence on an objection based on the means of transmission.
6. In a proceeding under this chapter, a tribunal of this State
shall permit a party or witness residing outside this State to be
deposed or to testify under penalty of perjury by telephone,
audiovisual means or other electronic means at a designated tribunal
or other location. A tribunal of this State shall cooperate with other
tribunals in designating an appropriate location for the deposition or
testimony.
7. In a civil proceeding under this chapter, if a party called to
testify refuses to answer a question on the ground that the testimony
may be self-incriminating, the trier of fact may draw an adverse
inference from the refusal.
8. A privilege against the disclosure of communications
between a married couple or between domestic partners does not
apply in a proceeding under this chapter.
9. The defense of immunity based on the relationship of a
married couple , domestic partners or parent and child does not
apply in a proceeding under this chapter.
-
*AB424*

– 41 –
10. A [voluntary acknowledgment of paternity developed by
the State Board of Health pursuant to NRS 440.283 or a] voluntary
acknowledgment of parentage developed by the State Board of
Health pursuant to NRS 440.285, certified as a true copy, is
admissible to establish parentage of the child.
Sec. 112. NRS 130.401 is hereby amended to read as follows:
130.401 1. If a support order entitled to recognition under
this chapter has not been issued, a responding tribunal of this State
with personal jurisdiction over the parties may issue a support order
if:
(a) The natural person seeking the order resides outside this
State; or
(b) The support-enforcement agency seeking the order is located
outside this State.
2. The tribunal may issue a temporary child-support order if
the tribunal determines that such an order is appropriate and the
natural person ordered to pay is:
(a) A presumed [father] parent of the child under [subsection 1
of NRS 126.051;] section 38 of this act;
(b) Petitioning to have [his paternity] their parentage
adjudicated;
(c) Identified as the [father] parent of the child through genetic
testing;
(d) An alleged [father] genetic parent who has declined to
submit to genetic testing;
(e) Shown by clear and convincing evidence to be the [father]
parent of the child;
(f) An [acknowledged father or] acknowledged parent as
provided by [NRS 126.053;] sections 39 to 52, inclusive, of this
act;
(g) The [mother of] person who gave birth to the child; or
(h) A natural person who has been ordered to pay child support
in a previous proceeding and the order has not been reversed or
vacated.
3. Upon finding, after notice and opportunity to be heard, that
an obligor owes a duty of support, the tribunal shall issue a support
order directed to the obligor and may issue other orders pursuant to
NRS 130.305.
Sec. 113. NRS 3.405 is hereby amended to read as follows:
3.405 1. In an action to establish [paternity,] parentage, the
court may appoint a master to take testimony and recommend
orders.
2. The court may appoint a master to hear all cases in a county
to establish or enforce an obligation for the support of a child, or to
-
*AB424*

– 42 –
modify or adjust an order for the support of a child pursuant to
NRS 125B.145.
3. The master must be an attorney licensed to practice in this
State. The master:
(a) Shall take testimony and establish a record;
(b) In complex cases shall issue temporary orders for support
pending resolution of the case;
(c) Shall make findings of fact, conclusions of law and
recommendations for the establishment and enforcement of an
order;
(d) May accept voluntary acknowledgments of [paternity]
parentage or liability for support and stipulated agreements setting
the amount of support;
(e) May, subject to confirmation by the district court, enter
default orders against a responsible parent who does not respond to
a notice or service within the required time; and
(f) Has any other power or duty contained in the order of
reference issued by the court.
 If a temporary order for support is issued pursuant to paragraph
(b), the master shall order that the support be paid to the Division of
Welfare and Supportive Services of the Department of Health and
Human Services, its designated representative or the district
attorney, if the Division of Welfare and Supportive Services or
district attorney is involved in the case, or otherwise to an
appropriate party to the action, pending resolution of the case.
4. The findings of fact, conclusions of law and
recommendations of the master must be furnished to each party or
the party’s attorney at the conclusion of the proceeding or as soon
thereafter as possible. Within 10 days after receipt of the findings of
fact, conclusions of law and recommendations, either party may file
with the court and serve upon the other party written objections to
the report. If no objection is filed, the court shall accept the findings
of fact, unless clearly erroneous, and the judgment may be entered
thereon. If an objection is filed within the 10-day period, the court
shall review the matter upon notice and motion.
Sec. 114. NRS 41.1335 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41.1335 1. A person who has suffered an injury as a result of
a violation of NRS 200.975 may bring an action for the recovery of
his or her actual damages and any punitive damages which the facts
may warrant if the person is or was, at the time of assisted
reproduction:
(a) A patient who gave birth to a child conceived through
assisted reproduction as a result of a violation of NRS 200.975;
-
*AB424*

– 43 –
(b) The spouse of a patient who gave birth to a child conceived
through assisted reproduction as a result of a violation of
NRS 200.975;
(c) A child conceived through assisted reproduction as a result
of a violation of NRS 200.975; or
(d) A donor whose human reproductive material resulted in the
birth of a child conceived through assisted reproduction as a result
of a violation of NRS 200.975.
2. Each child born as a result of a violation of NRS 200.975
constitutes the basis for a separate cause of action.
3. A person who prevails in an action brought pursuant to
subsection 1 may recover his or her actual damages, attorney’s fees
and costs and any punitive damages that the facts may warrant.
4. The liability imposed by this section is in addition to any
other liability imposed by law.
5. For the purposes of this section, a violation of NRS 200.975
shall be deemed to have been committed where the procedure for
assisted reproduction occurred or at the principal place of business
of the provider of health care.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Assisted reproduction” has the meaning ascribed to it in
[NRS 126.510.] section 8 of this act.
(b) “Human reproductive material” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 200.970.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 200.975.
Sec. 115. NRS 200.359 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.359 1. A person having a limited right of custody to a
child by operation of law or pursuant to an order, judgment or
decree of any court, including a judgment or decree which grants
another person rights to custody or visitation of the child, or any
parent having no right of custody to the child, who:
(a) In violation of an order, judgment or decree of any court
willfully detains, conceals or removes the child from a parent,
guardian or other person having lawful custody or a right of
visitation of the child; or
(b) In the case of an order, judgment or decree of any court that
does not specify when the right to physical custody or visitation is to
be exercised, removes the child from the jurisdiction of the court
without the consent of either the court or all persons who have the
right to custody or visitation,
 is guilty of a category D felony and shall be punished as provided
in NRS 193.130.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a parent
who has joint legal and physical custody of a child pursuant to
-
*AB424*

– 44 –
NRS 125C.0015 shall not willfully conceal or remove the child
from the custody of the other parent with the specific intent to
frustrate the efforts of the other parent to establish or maintain a
meaningful relationship with the child. A person who violates this
subsection shall be punished as provided in subsection 1 unless the
person demonstrates to the satisfaction of the court that he or she
violated this subsection to protect the child or himself or herself
from an act that constitutes domestic violence pursuant to
NRS 33.018.
3. If [the mother] a parent of a child has primary physical
custody of the child pursuant to [subsection 2 of] NRS 125C.003,
[the father] another parent of the child shall not willfully conceal or
remove the child from the physical custody of the [mother. If the
father of a child has] parent who has primary physical custody .
[pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 125C.003, the mother of the child
shall not willfully conceal or remove the child from the physical
custody of the father.] A person who violates this subsection shall
be punished as provided in subsection 1.
4. A parent who has joint physical custody of a child pursuant
to an order, judgment or decree of a court shall not relocate with the
child pursuant to NRS 125C.0065 without the written consent of
the non-relocating parent or before the court enters an order granting
the parent primary physical custody of the child and permission to
relocate with the child, as applicable. A person who violates this
subsection shall be punished as provided in subsection 1.
5. A parent who has primary physical custody of a child
pursuant to an order, judgment or decree of a court shall not relocate
with the child pursuant to NRS 125C.006 without the written
consent of the non-relocating parent or the permission of the court.
A person who violates this subsection shall be punished as provided
in subsection 1.
6. Before an arrest warrant may be issued for a violation of this
section, the court must find that:
(a) This is the home state of the child, as defined in NRS
125A.085; and
(b) There is cause to believe that the entry of a court order in a
civil proceeding brought pursuant to chapter 125, 125A or 125C of
NRS will not be effective to enforce the rights of the parties and
would not be in the best interests of the child.
7. Upon conviction for a violation of this section, the court
shall order the defendant to pay restitution for any expenses incurred
in locating or recovering the child.
8. The prosecuting attorney may recommend to the judge that
the defendant be sentenced as for a misdemeanor and the judge may
impose such a sentence if the judge finds that:
-
*AB424*

– 45 –
(a) The defendant has no prior conviction for this offense and
the child has suffered no substantial harm as a result of the offense;
or
(b) The interests of justice require that the defendant be
punished as for a misdemeanor.
9. A person who aids or abets any other person to violate this
section shall be punished as provided in subsection 1.
10. In addition to the exemption set forth in subsection 11,
subsections 4 and 5 do not apply to a person who demonstrates a
compelling excuse, to the satisfaction of the court, for relocating
with a child in violation of NRS 125C.006 or 125C.0065.
11. This section does not apply to a person who detains,
conceals, removes or relocates with a child to protect the child from
the imminent danger of abuse or neglect or to protect himself or
herself from imminent physical harm, and reported the detention,
concealment, removal or relocation to a law enforcement agency or
an agency which provides child welfare services within 24 hours
after detaining, concealing, removing or relocating with the child, or
as soon as the circumstances allowed. As used in this subsection:
(a) “Abuse or neglect” has the meaning ascribed to it in
paragraph (a) of subsection 4 of NRS 200.508.
(b) “Agency which provides child welfare services” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 432B.030.
Sec. 116. NRS 200.965 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.965 “Assisted reproduction” has the meaning ascribed to it
in [NRS 126.510.] section 8 of this act.
Sec. 117. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, [126.141,] 126.161, 126.163,
126.730, 127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090,
130.312, 130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075,
172.245, 176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129,
176.156, 176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717,
179.495, 179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771,
200.3772, 200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392,
209.3923, 209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140,
213.010, 213.040, 213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464,
-
*AB424*

– 46 –
217.475, 218A.350, 218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240,
218G.350, 218G.615, 224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450,
228.495, 228.570, 231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190,
237.300, 239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030,
239B.040, 239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250,
239C.270, 239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105,
244.264, 244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087,
250.130, 250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490,
268.910, 269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350,
281A.680, 281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068,
284.4086, 286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387,
289.830, 293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757,
293.870, 293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510,
331.110, 332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379,
338.1593, 338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
-
*AB424*

– 47 –
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, sections 35, 38 and 41 of chapter 478, Statutes of Nevada
2011 and section 2 of chapter 391, Statutes of Nevada 2013 and
unless otherwise declared by law to be confidential, all public books
and public records of a governmental entity must be open at all
times during office hours to inspection by any person, and may be
fully copied or an abstract or memorandum may be prepared from
those public books and public records. Any such copies, abstracts or
memoranda may be used to supply the general public with copies,
abstracts or memoranda of the records or may be used in any other
way to the advantage of the governmental entity or of the general
public. This section does not supersede or in any manner affect the
federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge, diminish or affect in
any other manner the rights of a person in any written book or
record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
-
*AB424*

– 48 –
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 118. NRS 422A.585 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
422A.585 1. The Division shall, within the limitations of
available funding, establish a program which promotes the self-
sufficiency of a [natural father] parent whose [paternity] parentage
is presumed pursuant to [NRS 126.051] section 38 of this act or a
noncustodial parent of a child for whom benefits are being received
by a household.
2. If a [natural father] parent whose [paternity] parentage is
presumed pursuant to [NRS 126.051] section 38 of this act or a
noncustodial parent of a child for whom benefits are being received
by a household chooses to participate in the program established
pursuant to subsection 1, the Division may, within the limitations of
-
*AB424*

– 49 –
available funding, increase the amount of benefits provided to the
head of the household on behalf of the child.
Sec. 119. NRS 432B.560 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
432B.560 1. The court may also order:
(a) The child, a parent or the guardian to undergo such medical,
psychiatric, psychological, or other care or treatment as the court
considers to be in the best interests of the child.
(b) A parent or guardian to refrain from:
(1) Any harmful or offensive conduct toward the child, the
other parent, the custodian of the child or the person given physical
custody of the child; and
(2) Visiting the child if the court determines that the
visitation is not in the best interest of the child.
(c) A reasonable right of visitation for a grandparent of the child
if the child is not permitted to remain in the custody of the parents
of the child.
(d) Tests for the typing of blood or taking of specimens for
genetic identification [of the child, the natural mother of the child or
the alleged father of the child] pursuant to [NRS 126.121.] sections
53 to 67, inclusive, of this act.
2. The court shall order a parent or guardian to pay to the
custodian an amount sufficient to support the child while the child is
in the care of the custodian pursuant to an order of the court, unless
the child was delivered to a provider of emergency services pursuant
to NRS 432B.630. Payments for the obligation of support must be
determined in accordance with the guidelines established by the
Administrator of the Division of Welfare and Supportive Services of
the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to NRS
425.620, but must not exceed the reasonable cost of the child’s care,
including food, shelter, clothing, medical care and education. An
order for support made pursuant to this subsection must:
(a) Require that payments be made to the appropriate agency or
office;
(b) Provide that the custodian is entitled to a lien on the
obligor’s property in the event of nonpayment of support; and
(c) Provide for the immediate withholding of income for the
payment of support unless:
(1) All parties enter into an alternative written agreement; or
(2) One party demonstrates and the court finds good cause to
postpone the withholding.
3. A court that enters an order pursuant to subsection 2 shall
ensure that the social security number of the parent or guardian who
is the subject of the order is:
-
*AB424*

– 50 –
(a) Provided to the Division of Welfare and Supportive Services
of the Department of Health and Human Services.
(b) Placed in the records relating to the matter and, except as
otherwise required to carry out a specific statute, maintained in a
confidential manner.
Sec. 120. NRS 440.280 is hereby amended to read as follows:
440.280 1. If a birth occurs in a hospital or the person
[giving] who gave birth to a child and the child are immediately
transported to a hospital, the person in charge of the hospital or his
or her designated representative shall obtain the necessary
information, prepare a birth certificate, secure the signatures
required by the certificate and file it within 10 days with the health
officer of the registration district where the birth occurred. The
physician in attendance shall provide the medical information
required by the certificate and certify to the fact of birth within 72
hours after the birth. If the physician does not certify to the fact of
birth within the required 72 hours, the person in charge of the
hospital or the designated representative shall complete and sign the
certification.
2. If a birth occurs outside a hospital and the person [giving]
who gave birth to a child and the child are not immediately
transported to a hospital, the birth certificate must be prepared and
filed by one of the following persons in the following order of
priority:
(a) The physician in attendance at or immediately after the birth.
(b) Any other person in attendance at or immediately after the
birth.
(c) [The person giving birth or other] A parent or, if [the other]
each parent is absent [and the person giving birth is] or
incapacitated, the person in charge of the premises where the birth
occurred.
3. If a birth occurs in a moving conveyance, the place of birth
is the place where the child is removed from the conveyance.
4. In cities, the certificate of birth must be filed sooner than 10
days after the birth if so required by municipal ordinance or
regulation.
5. If the person [giving] who gave birth to a child was:
(a) Married or in a domestic partnership at the time of the birth,
the name of the spouse or domestic partner of [that] the person who
gave birth must be entered on the certificate as the other parent of
the child unless:
(1) A court has issued an order establishing that a person
other than the spouse or domestic partner of the person [giving]
who gave birth is the other parent of the child; or
-
*AB424*

– 51 –
(2) The person [giving] who gave birth and a person other
than the spouse or domestic partner of the person [giving] who
gave birth have signed [a declaration for the voluntary
acknowledgment of paternity developed by the Board pursuant to
NRS 440.283 or] a declaration for the voluntary acknowledgment of
parentage developed by the Board pursuant to NRS 440.285 [.] and
the spouse or domestic partner of the person who gave birth has
signed a voluntary denial of parentage developed by the Board
pursuant to NRS 440.285.
(b) Widowed at the time of birth but married or in a domestic
partnership at the time of conception, the name of the spouse or
domestic partner of the person [giving] who gave birth at the time
of conception must be entered on the certificate as the other parent
of the child unless:
(1) A court has issued an order establishing that a person
other than the spouse or domestic partner of the person [giving]
who gave birth at the time of conception is the other parent of the
child; or
(2) The person [giving] who gave birth and a person other
than the spouse or domestic partner of the person [giving] who
gave birth at the time of conception have signed [a declaration for
the voluntary acknowledgment of paternity developed by the Board
pursuant to NRS 440.283 or] a declaration for the voluntary
acknowledgment of parentage developed by the Board pursuant to
NRS 440.285 [.] and the spouse or domestic partner of the person
who gave birth has signed a voluntary denial of parentage
developed by the Board pursuant to NRS 440.285.
6. If the person [giving] who gave birth was unmarried and not
in a domestic partnership at the time of the birth, the name of the
other parent may be entered on the original certificate of birth only
if:
(a) The provisions of paragraph (b) of subsection 5 are
applicable;
(b) A court has issued an order establishing that the person is the
other parent of the child; or
(c) The parents of the child have signed [a declaration for the
voluntary acknowledgment of paternity developed by the Board
pursuant to NRS 440.283 or] a declaration for the voluntary
acknowledgment of parentage developed by the Board pursuant to
NRS 440.285. If both parents execute a declaration consenting to
the use of the surname of one parent as the surname of the child, the
name of that parent must be entered on the original certificate of
birth and the surname of that parent must be entered thereon as the
surname of the child.
-
*AB424*

– 52 –
7. An order entered or a declaration executed pursuant to
subsection 6 must be submitted to the local health officer, the local
health officer’s authorized representative, or the attending physician
or midwife before a proper certificate of birth is forwarded to the
State Registrar. The order or declaration must then be delivered to
the State Registrar for filing. The State Registrar’s file of orders and
declarations must be sealed and the contents of the file may be
examined only upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction or at
the request of either parent or the Division of Welfare and
Supportive Services of the Department of Health and Human
Services as necessary to carry out the provisions of 42 U.S.C. §
654a. The local health officer shall complete the original certificate
of birth in accordance with subsection 6 and other provisions of this
chapter.
8. As used in this section, “court” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 125B.004.
Sec. 121. NRS 440.285 is hereby amended to read as follows:
440.285 1. The Board shall:
(a) Develop [a declaration] declarations to be signed under
penalty of perjury for the voluntary acknowledgment of parentage
and the voluntary denial of parentage in this State [;] pursuant to
sections 39 to 52, inclusive, of this act; and
(b) Distribute the declarations to each hospital or freestanding
birthing center in this State.
2. Before providing a declaration for the acknowledgment of
parentage or denial of parentage to [the person who gave birth to a
child or] a person who wishes to acknowledge or deny the parentage
of a child, the agencies described in paragraph (b) of subsection 1
shall ensure that [the person who gave birth and] the person who
wishes to acknowledge or deny parentage [are] is given notice,
orally and in writing, of the rights, responsibilities and legal
consequences of, and the alternatives to, signing the declaration for
the acknowledgment of parentage [.] or declaration for the denial
of parentage.
Sec. 122. NRS 440.287 is hereby amended to read as follows:
440.287 1. If a person who has given birth or a person who
has signed [a declaration for the voluntary acknowledgment of
paternity developed by the Board pursuant to NRS 440.283 or] a
declaration for the voluntary acknowledgment of parentage
developed by the Board pursuant to NRS 440.285 with the person
who has given birth rescinds the acknowledgment pursuant to
[subsection 2 of NRS 126.053,] section 46 of this act, the State
Registrar shall not issue a new certificate of birth to remove the
name of the person who originally acknowledged [paternity or]
parentage [, as applicable,] unless a court issues an order
-
*AB424*

– 53 –
establishing that the person who acknowledged [paternity or]
parentage [, as applicable,] is not the [father or] parent [, as
applicable,] of the child.
2. As used in this section, “court” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 125B.004.
Sec. 123. NRS 440.319 is hereby amended to read as follows:
440.319 1. Whenever the State Registrar receives an order
issued by a district court in this State pursuant to subsection 4 of
NRS 126.720 validating a gestational agreement and declaring the
intended parent or parents to be the parent or parents of the resulting
child, the State Registrar shall prepare and file a certificate of birth
in the name of the child which shows the intended parent or parents
as the parent or parents of the child and seal and file the order and
the original certificate of birth, if any. Unless the court order is
issued by a district court in this State for an action which was
originally commenced in this State, a court order concerning a
gestational agreement is not valid for any purpose in this State as it
relates to a child born in this State, including, without limitation, the
preparation and filing of a certificate of birth by the State Registrar.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Gestational agreement” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 126.570.
(b) “Intended parent” has the meaning ascribed to it in [NRS
126.590.] section 17 of this act.
Sec. 124. NRS 440.325 is hereby amended to read as follows:
440.325 1. In the case of the [paternity or] parentage of a
child being established by the:
(a) [Person who gave birth and other parent acknowledging
paternity of a child by signing a declaration for the voluntary
acknowledgment of paternity developed by the Board pursuant to
NRS 440.283;
(b)] Person who gave birth to the child and another person
acknowledging parentage of the child by signing a declaration for
the voluntary acknowledgment of parentage developed by the Board
pursuant to NRS 440.285; or
[(c)] (b) Order of a district court,
 the State Registrar, upon the receipt of the declaration or court
order, shall prepare a new certificate of birth in the name of the
child as shown in the declaration or order with no reference to the
fact of legitimation.
2. The new certificate must be identical with the certificate
registered for the birth of a child born in wedlock.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the evidence
upon which the new certificate was made and the original certificate
-
*AB424*

– 54 –
must be sealed and filed and may be opened only upon the order of
a court of competent jurisdiction.
4. The State Registrar shall, upon the request of the Division of
Welfare and Supportive Services of the Department of Health and
Human Services, open a file that has been sealed pursuant to
subsection 3 to allow the Division to compare the information
contained in the declaration or order upon which the new certificate
was made with the information maintained pursuant to 42 U.S.C. §
654a.
Sec. 125. NRS 449.246 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.246 1. Before discharging [an unmarried woman who
has borne] a person who gave birth to a child, a hospital or
freestanding birthing center shall provide to the child’s parents:
(a) The opportunity to sign, in the hospital, a declaration for the
voluntary acknowledgment of [paternity] parentage developed
pursuant to NRS [440.283;] 440.285 and, if applicable, a voluntary
denial of parentage developed pursuant to NRS 440.285;
(b) Written materials about establishing [paternity;] parentage;
(c) The forms necessary to acknowledge [paternity] or deny
parentage voluntarily;
(d) A written description of the rights and responsibilities of
acknowledging [paternity;] parentage; and
(e) The opportunity to speak by telephone with personnel of the
program for enforcement of child support who are trained to clarify
information and answer questions about the establishment of
[paternity.] parentage.
2. The Administrator of the Division of Welfare and
Supportive Services of the Department of Health and Human
Services shall adopt the regulations necessary to ensure that the
services provided by a hospital or freestanding birthing center
pursuant to this section are in compliance with the regulations
adopted by the Secretary of Health and Human Services pursuant to
42 U.S.C. § 666(a)(5)(C).
Sec. 126. NRS 629.151 is hereby amended to read as follows:
629.151 It is unlawful to obtain any genetic information of a
person without first obtaining the informed consent of the person or
the person’s legal guardian pursuant to NRS 629.181, unless the
information is obtained:
1. By a federal, state, county or city law enforcement agency to
establish the identity of a person or dead human body;
2. [To determine the parentage or identity of a person pursuant
to NRS 56.020;
3.] To determine the [paternity] parentage of a person pursuant
to NRS [126.121 or] 425.384 [;
4.] or sections 53 to 67, inclusive, of this act;
-
*AB424*

– 55 –
3. For use in a study where the identities of the persons from
whom the genetic information is obtained are not disclosed to the
person conducting the study;
[5.] 4. To determine the presence of certain preventable or
inheritable disorders in an infant pursuant to NRS 442.008 or a
provision of federal law; or
[6.] 5. Pursuant to an order of a court of competent
jurisdiction.
Sec. 127. NRS 629.171 is hereby amended to read as follows:
629.171 It is unlawful to disclose or to compel a person to
disclose the identity of a person who was the subject of a genetic
test or to disclose genetic information of that person in a manner
that allows identification of the person, without first obtaining the
informed consent of that person or his or her legal guardian pursuant
to NRS 629.181, unless the information is disclosed:
1. To conduct a criminal investigation, an investigation
concerning the death of a person or a criminal or juvenile
proceeding;
2. [To determine the parentage or identity of a person pursuant
to NRS 56.020;
3.] To determine the [paternity] parentage of a person pursuant
to NRS [126.121 or] 425.384 [;
4.] or sections 53 to 67, inclusive, of this act;
3. Pursuant to an order of a court of competent jurisdiction;
[5.] 4. By a physician and is the genetic information of a
deceased person that will assist in the medical diagnosis of persons
related to the deceased person by blood;
[6.] 5. To a federal, state, county or city law enforcement
agency to establish the identity of a person or dead human body;
[7.] 6. To determine the presence of certain preventable or
inheritable disorders in an infant pursuant to NRS 442.008 or a
provision of federal law;
[8.] 7. To carry out the provisions of NRS 442.300 to 442.330,
inclusive;
[9.] 8. By an agency of criminal justice pursuant to NRS
179A.075; or
[10.] 9. As permitted by the Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, and the
regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
Sec. 128. NRS 629.260 is hereby amended to read as follows:
629.260 1. A health care facility shall not provide a patient
with human reproductive material for assisted reproduction except
in accordance with any written agreement entered into between:
(a) The health care facility and the patient; and
(b) The health care facility and the donor.
-
*AB424*

– 56 –
2. A health care facility that violates the provisions of this
section is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $10,000 for
each violation. This penalty must be recovered in a civil action,
brought in the name of the State of Nevada by the Attorney General.
In such an action, the Attorney General may recover reasonable
attorney’s fees and costs. If a civil penalty is imposed against a
health care facility for violating the provisions of this section, the
Attorney General shall, within 30 days after the imposition of the
civil penalty, notify:
(a) The Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services, if the violation was
committed by a medical facility or medical laboratory.
(b) The occupational licensing board responsible for licensing
the provider of health care who oversees an unlicensed health care
facility, if the violation was committed by a health care facility that
is not a medical facility or medical laboratory.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Assisted reproduction” has the meaning ascribed to it in
[NRS 126.510.] section 8 of this act.
(b) “Health care facility” means a medical facility, sperm bank,
laboratory, clinic or office of a provider of health care that provides
services relating to assisted reproduction.
(c) “Human reproductive material” means a gamete or human
organism at any stage of development from fertilized ovum to
embryo.
(d) “Medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0151.
(e) “Medical laboratory” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 652.060.
(f) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 200.975.
Sec. 129. NRS 652.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
652.210 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 and
NRS [126.121 and] 652.186 [,] and sections 53 to 67, inclusive, of
this act, no person other than a licensed physician, a licensed
optometrist, a licensed practical nurse, a registered nurse, a
perfusionist, a physician assistant licensed pursuant to chapter 630
or 633 of NRS, a certified advanced emergency medical technician,
a certified paramedic, a practitioner of respiratory care licensed
pursuant to chapter 630 of NRS, a licensed anesthesiologist
assistant, a licensed dentist or a registered pharmacist may
manipulate a person for the collection of specimens. The persons
described in this subsection may perform any laboratory test which
is classified as a waived test pursuant to Subpart A of Part 493 of
Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations without obtaining
-
*AB424*

– 57 –
certification as an assistant in a medical laboratory pursuant to
NRS 652.127.
2. The technical personnel of a laboratory may collect blood,
remove stomach contents, perform certain diagnostic skin tests or
field blood tests or collect material for smears and cultures.
Sec. 130. NRS 689A.0424 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.0424 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
health insurance that includes coverage for maternity care shall not
deny, limit or seek reimbursement for maternity care because the
insured is acting as a gestational carrier.
2. If an insured acts as a gestational carrier, the child shall be
deemed to be a child of the intended parent, as defined in [NRS
126.590,] section 17 of this act, for purposes related to the policy of
health insurance.
3. As used in this section, “gestational carrier” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 126.580.
Sec. 131. NRS 689B.03766 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.03766 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
group health insurance that includes coverage for maternity care
shall not deny, limit or seek reimbursement for maternity care
because the insured is acting as a gestational carrier.
2. If an insured acts as a gestational carrier, the child shall be
deemed to be a child of the intended parent, as defined in [NRS
126.590,] section 17 of this act, for purposes related to the policy of
group health insurance.
3. As used in this section, “gestational carrier” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 126.580.
Sec. 132. NRS 689C.1945 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.1945 1. A carrier that offers or issues a health benefit
plan that includes coverage for maternity care shall not deny, limit
or seek reimbursement for maternity care because the insured is
acting as a gestational carrier.
2. If an insured acts as a gestational carrier, the child shall be
deemed to be a child of the intended parent, as defined in [NRS
126.590,] section 17 of this act, for purposes related to the health
benefit plan.
3. As used in this section, “gestational carrier” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 126.580.
Sec. 133. NRS 695A.1857 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695A.1857 1. A society that offers or issues a benefit
contract that includes coverage for maternity care shall not deny,
-
*AB424*

– 58 –
limit or seek reimbursement for maternity care because the insured
is acting as a gestational carrier.
2. If an insured acts as a gestational carrier, the child shall be
deemed to be a child of the intended parent, as defined in [NRS
126.590,] section 17 of this act, for purposes related to the benefit
contract.
3. As used in this section, “gestational carrier” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 126.580.
Sec. 134. NRS 695B.1948 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.1948 1. An insurer that offers or issues a contract for
hospital or medical services that includes coverage for maternity
care shall not deny, limit or seek reimbursement for maternity care
because the insured is acting as a gestational carrier.
2. If an insured acts as a gestational carrier, the child shall be
deemed to be a child of the intended parent, as defined in [NRS
126.590,] section 17 of this act, for purposes related to the contract
for hospital or medical services.
3. As used in this section, “gestational carrier” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 126.580.
Sec. 135. NRS 695C.1712 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.1712 1. A health maintenance organization that offers
or issues a health care plan that includes coverage for maternity care
shall not deny, limit or seek reimbursement for maternity care
because the enrollee is acting as a gestational carrier.
2. If an enrollee acts as a gestational carrier, the child shall be
deemed to be a child of the intended parent, as defined in [NRS
126.590,] section 17 of this act, for purposes related to the health
care plan.
3. As used in this section, “gestational carrier” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 126.580.
Sec. 136. NRS 695G.1716 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.1716 1. A managed care organization that offers or
issues a health care plan that includes coverage for maternity care
shall not deny, limit or seek reimbursement for maternity care
because the insured is acting as a gestational carrier.
2. If an insured acts as a gestational carrier, the child shall be
deemed to be a child of the intended parent, as defined in [NRS
126.590,] section 17 of this act, for purposes related to the health
care plan.
3. As used in this section, “gestational carrier” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 126.580.
-
*AB424*

– 59 –
Sec. 137. The amendatory provisions of this act apply to a
pending proceeding to adjudicate parentage commenced before
October 1, 2025, for an issue on which a judgment has not been
entered.
Sec. 138. The Legislative Counsel shall:
1. In preparing the Nevada Revised Statutes, use the authority
set forth in subsection 10 of NRS 220.120 to appropriately replace
references to the term “paternity” with the term “parentage,”
references to the term “father” with the term “parent” and references
to the term “mother” with the term “parent,” “person who gave
birth,” “person who will give birth,” “person giving birth” or other
similar term, as appropriate given the context, in the manner
provided in this act; and
2. In preparing the supplements of the Nevada Administrative
Code, appropriately replace reference to the term “paternity” with
the term “parentage,” reference to the term “father” with the term
“parent” and references to the term “mother” with the term “parent,”
“person who gave birth,” “person who will give birth,” “person
giving birth” or another similar term, as appropriate given the
context, in the manner provided in this act.
Sec. 139. NRS 56.020, 126.021, 126.041, 126.051, 126.053,
126.071, 126.081, 126.091, 126.101, 126.105, 126.111, 126.121,
126.131, 126.141, 126.143, 126.171, 126.223, 126.231, 126.510,
126.540, 126.550, 126.560, 126.590, 126.600, 126.610, 126.620,
126.630 and 440.283 are hereby repealed.
LEADLINES OF REPEALED SECTIONS
56.020 Determination of parentage or identity.
126.021 Definitions.
126.041 Establishment of relationship.
126.051 Presumptions of paternity.
126.053 Voluntary acknowledgment of paternity or
parentage.
126.071 Who may bring action; when action may be
brought.
126.081 Period of limitations.
126.091 Jurisdiction; joinder; venue.
126.101 Parties.
126.105 Service of process.
126.111 Pretrial hearing; testimony.
-
*AB424*

– 60 –
126.121 Tests for typing of blood or genetic identification;
admissibility in court; effect of refusal to submit to test.
126.131 Evidence relating to paternity; evidence of costs of
certain medical services.
126.141 Pretrial recommendations.
126.143 Order for temporary support of child.
126.171 Costs.
126.223 Entry of default upon failure to plead or defend in
action.
126.231 Who may bring action; provisions of chapter
applicable to action.
126.510 “Assisted reproduction” defined.
126.540 “Donor” defined.
126.550 “Embryo” defined.
126.560 “Gamete” defined.
126.590 “Intended parent” defined.
126.600 “In vitro fertilization” defined.
126.610 “Parent” defined.
126.620 “Record” defined.
126.630 “Sign” defined.
440.283 Voluntary acknowledgment of paternity: Board to
develop and distribute declarations to be signed; certain entities
to provide services and notice concerning effect of declaration.
H
-
*AB424*